Tabby (adjective)
Tábby. adj. Brindled; brindled; varied with different colours.
A tabby cat in the chimney-corner. Addison.
On her tabby rival's face,She deep will mark her new disgrace. Prior.

Tabby (noun)
Tábby. n.s. [tabi, tabino, Italian; tabis, French.] A kind of waved silk.
Brocades, and tabies, and gauses. Swift.

Tabefaction
Tabefáction. n.s. [tabefacio, Latin.] The act of wasting away.

Tabefy
Tábefy. v.n. [tabefacio, Latin.] To waste; to be extenuated by disease. In the following example it is improperly a verb active.
Meat eaten in greater quantity than is convenient tabefies the body. Harvey on Consumption.

Tachygraphy
Táchygraphy. n.s. [ταχὺς and γράφω.] The art or practice of quick writing.

Tail (noun)
Tail. n.s. [tæʒl, Saxon.]

 That which terminates the animal behind; the continuation of the vertebræ of the back hanging loose behind.
Oft have I seen a hot o'er-weening cur,Run back and bite, because he was with-held,Who, having suffer'd with the bear's fell paw,Hath clapt his tail betwixt his legs and cry'd. Shakespeare.
This sees the cub, and does himself oppose,And men and boats his active tail confounds. Waller.
The lion will not kick, but will strike such a stroke with his tail, that will break the back of his encounter. More.
Rouz'd by the lash of his own stubborn tail,Our lion now will foreign foes assail. Dryden.
The tail fin is half a foot high, but underneath level with the tail. Grew.
 The lower part.
The Lord shall make thee the head, and not the tail, and thou shalt be above, and not beneath. Deut. xxviii. 13.
 Any thing hanging long; a cat-kin.
Duretus writes a great praise of the distilled water of those tails that hang upon willow trees. Harvey on Consumptions.
 The hinder part of any thing.
With the helm they turn and steer the tail. Butler.
 To turn Tail. To fly; to run away.
Would she turn tail to the heron, and fly quite out another way; but all was to return in a higher pitch. Sidney.

Taint (noun)
Taint. n.s. [teinte, Fr. from the verb.]

 A tincture; a stain.

 An insect.
There is found in the Summer a spider called a taint, of a red colour, and so little that ten of the largest will hardly outweigh a grain. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iii.
As killing as the canker to the rose,Or taint worm to the weaning herds that graze. Milton.
 Infection.
A father that breeds his son at home, can keep him better from the taint of servants than abroad. Locke on Education.
But is no rank, no station, no degree,From this contagious taint of sorrow free. Prior.
 A spot; a soil; a blemish.
                  Her offenceMust be of such unnatural degree,That monsters it; or your forevouch'd affectionFall'n into taint. Shakespeare's King Lear.
                                Now IUnspeak mine own detraction; here abjureThe taints and blames I laid upon myself. Shakespeare.
My hellhounds shall lick up the draff and filth,Which man's polluting sin with taint hath shedOn what was pure. Milton.

Taint (verb active)
To Taint. v.a. [teindre, French.]

 To imbue or impregnate with any thing.
                The spaniel struckStiff by the tainted gale, with open noseDraws full upon the latent prey. Thomson.
 To stain; to sully.
We come not by the way of accusationTo taint that honour every good tongue blesses. Shakesp.
                  Sirens taintThe minds of all men, whom they can acquaintWith their attractions. Chapman's Odyssey, b. xii.
                They the truthWith superstitions and traditions taint. Milton.
Those pure immortal elementsEject him tainted now, and purge him offAs a distemper. Milton.
 To infect.
Nothing taints sound lungs sooner than inspiring the breath of consumptive lungs. Harvey on Consumptions.
Salts in fumes contract the vesicles, and perhaps the tainted air may affect the lungs by its heat. Arbuthnot on Air.
With wholesome herbage mixt, the direful baneOf vegetable venom taints the plain. Pope.
 To corrupt.
A sweet-bread you found it tainted or fly-blown. Swift.
            The yellow tinging plagueInternal vision taints. Thomson's Spring.
 A corrupt contraction of attaint.

Taint (verb neuter)
To Taint. v.n. To be infected; to be touched.
Till Birnam wood remove to DunsinaneI cannot taint with fear. Shakesp. Macbeth.

Taintless
Táintless. adj. [from taint.] Free from infection.
No humours gross, or frowzy streams,Could from her taintless body flow. Swift's Miscel.

Tainture
Táinture n.s. [tinctura, Lat. teinture, French.] Taint; tinge; defilement.
See here the tainture of thy nest,And look thyself be faultless. Shakespeare.

Take (verb active)
To Take. v.a. preterite took, part. pass. taken, sometimes took; taka, Islandish; ey tek, I take; ey took, I took.]

 To receive what is offered.
Then took I the cup at the Lord's hand, and made all the nations to drink. Jer. xxv. 17.
They refuse to take the cup at thine hand to drink. Jer.
Be thou advis'd, thy black design forsake;Death, or this counsel, from Lucippus take. Waller.
An honest man may take a knave's advice,But idiots only may be cozen'd twice. Dryden.
Madam, were I as you, I'd take her counsel. Philips.
Distress'd myself, like you, confin'd I live,And therefore can compassion take and give. Dryden.
 To seize what is not given.
In fetters one the barking porter ty'd,And took him trembling from his sovereign's side. Dryden.
 To receive.
No man shall take the nether or upper milstone to pledge. Deut. xxiv. 6.
 To receive with good or ill will.
For, what we know must be,Why should we, in our peevish opposition,Take it to heart. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
I will frown as they pass by, and let them take it as they lift. Shakesp. Romeo and Juliet.
La you! if you speak ill of the devil, how he takes it at heart. Shakesp. Twelfth Night.
Damasco, without any more ado, yielded unto the Turks; which the bassa took in so good part, that he would not suffer his soldiers to enter it. Knolles's Hist. of the Turks.
The king being in a rage, took it grievously that he was mocked. 2 Mac. vii. 39.
The queen hearing of a declination of monarchy, took it so ill as she would never after hear of the other's suit. Bacon.
A following hath ever been a thing civil, and well taken in monarchies, so it be without too much popularity. Bacon.
The diminution of the power of the nobility they took very heavily. Clarendon.
I hope you will not expect from me things demonstrated with certainty; but will take it well that I should offer at a new thing. Graunt.
If I have been a little pilfering, I take it bitterly of thee to tell me of it. Dryden.
The sole advice I could give him in conscience, would be that which he would take ill, and not follow. Swift.
 To lay hold on; to catch by surprise or artifice.
Who will believe a man that hath no house, and lodgeth wheresoever the night taketh him? Ecclus. xxxvi. 26.
They silenced those who opposed them, by traducing them abroad, or taking advantage against them in the house. Clar.
Men in their loose unguarded hours they take,Not that themselves are wise, but others weak. Pope.
 To snatch; to seize.
I am contented to dwell on the Divine Providence, and take up any occasion to lead me to its contemplation. Hale.
 To make prisoner.
Appoint a meeting with this old fat fellow,Where we may take him, and disgrace him for it. Shak.
King Lear hath lost, he and his daughter ta'en. Shak.
This man was taken of the Jews, and should have been killed. Acts xxii. 27.
They entering with wonderful celerity on every side, slew and took three hundred Janizaries. Knolles.
 To captivate with pleasure; to delight; to engage.
More than history can pattern, though devis'dAnd play'd to take spectators. Shakespeare.
                      I longTo hear the story of your life, which mustTake the ear strangely. Shakespeare's Tempest.
Let her not take thee with her eyelids. Prov. vi. 25.
Yet notwithstanding, taken by Perkin's amiable behaviour, he entertained him as became the person of Richard duke of York. Bacon's Henry VII.
Their song was partial, but the harmonySuspended hell, and took with ravishmentThe thronging audience. Milton.
If I renounce virtue, though naked, then I do it yet more when she is thus beautified on purpose to allure the eye, and take the heart. Decay of Piety.
This beauty shines through some mens actions, sets off all that they do, and takes all they come near. Locke.
Cleombrotus was so taken with this prospect, that he had no patience. Wake.
 To surprize; to catch.
Wise men are overborn when taken at a disadvantage. Collier of Confidence.
 To entrap; to catch in a snare.
Take us the foxes, that spoil the vines. 2 Cant. xv.
 To understand in any particular sense or manner.
The words are more properly taken for the air or æther than the heavens. Raleigh.
You take me right, Eupolis; for there is no possibility of an holy war. Bacon's holy War.
I take it, andiron brass, called white brass, hath some mixture of tin to help the lustre. Bacon.
Why, now you take me; these are ritesThat grace love's days, and crown his nights:These are the motions I would see. Benj. Johnson.
Give them one simple idea, and see that they take it right, and perfectly comprehend it. Locke.
Charity taken in its largest extent, is nothing else but the sincere love of God and our neighbour. Wake.
 To exact.
Take no usury of him or increase. Lev. xxv. 36.
 To get; to have; to appropriate.
And the king of Sodom said unto Abram, give me the persons, and take the goods to thyself. Gen. xiv. 21.
 To use; to employ.
This man always takes time, and ponders things maturely before he passes his judgment. Watts.
 To blast; to infect.
              Strike her young bones,You taking airs with lameness. Shakespeare.
 To judge in favour of.
The nicest eye could no distinction makeWhere lay the advantage, or what side to take. Dryden.
 To admit any thing bad from without.
              I ought to have a careTo keep my wounds from taking air. Hudibras, p. iii.
 To get; to procure.
Striking stones they took fire out of them. 2 Mac. x. 3.
 To turn to; to practise.
If any of the family be distressed, order is taken for their relief: if any be subject to vice, or take ill courses, they are reproved. Bacon's New Atlantis.
 To close in with; to comply with.
Old as I am, I take thee at thy word,And will to-morrow thank thee with my sword. Dryden.
She to her country's use resign'd your sword,And you, kind lover, took her at her word. Dryden.
I take thee at thy word. Rowe's Ambitious Stepmother.
Where any one thought is such, that we have power to take it up or lay it by, there we are at liberty. Locke.
 To form; to fix.
Resolutions taken upon full debate, were seldom prosecuted with equal resolution. Clarendon.
 To catch in the hand; to seize.
He put forth a hand, and took me by a lock of my head. Ezek. viii. 3.
I took not arms till urg'd by self defence. Dryden.
 To admit; to suffer.
Yet thy moist clay is pliant to command;Now take the mould; now bend thy mind to feelThe first sharp motions of the forming wheel. Dryden.
 To perform any action.
Peradventure we shall prevail against him, and take our revenge on him. Jer. xx. 10.
Uzzah put forth his hand to the ark, and took hold of it, for the oxen shook it. 2 Sam. vi. 6.
Taking my leave of them, I went into Macedonia. 2 Cor.
Before I proceed, I would be glad to take some breath. Bacon's holy War.
His wind he never took whilst the cup was at his mouth, but justly observed the rule of drinking with one breath. Hakewill on Providence.
            Then call'd his brothers,And her to whom his nuptial vows were bound;A long sigh he drew,And his voice failing, took his last adieu. Dryden's Fab.
              The Sabine Clausus came,And from afar, at Dryops took his aim. Dryden's Æn.
Her lovers names in order to run o'er,The girl took breath full thirty times and more. Dryden.
Heighten'd revenge he should have took;He should have burnt his tutor's book. Prior.
The husband's affairs made it necessary for him to take a voyage to Naples. Addison's Spectator.
I took a walk in Lincoln's Inn Garden. Tatler.
The Carthaginian took his feat, and Pompey entered with great dignity in his own person. Tatler.
I am possessed of power and credit, can gratify my favourites, and take vengeance on my enemies. Swift.
 To receive into the mind.
When they saw the boldness of Peter and John, they took knowledge of them that they had been with Jesus. Acts iv.
It appeared in his face, that he took great contentment in this our question. Bacon.
Doctor Moore, in his Ethicks, reckons this particular inclination, to take a prejudice against a man for his looks, among the smaller vices in morality, and names it a prosopolepsia. Addison's Spect. № 86.
A student should never satisfy himself with bare attendance on lectures, unless he clearly takes up the sense. Watts.
 To go into.
When news were brought that the French king besieged Constance, he posted to the sea-coast to take ship. Camden.
Tygers and lions are not apt to take the water. Hale.
 To go along; to follow; to persue.
The joyful short-liv'd news soon spread around,Took the same train. Dryden.
Observing still the motions of their flight,What course they took, what happy signs they shew. Dry.
 To swallow; to receive.
Consider the insatisfaction of several bodies, and of their appetite to take in others. Bacon's Nat. Hist.
Turkeys take down stones, having found in the gizzard of one no less than seven hundred. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
 To swallow as a medicine.
Tell an ignoramus in place to his face that he has a wit above all the world, and as fulsome a dose as you give him he shall readily take it down, and admit the commendation, though he cannot believe the thing. South.
Upon this assurance he took physick. Locke.
The glutinous mucilage that is on the outsides of the seeds washed off causes them to take. Mortimer's Husb.
 To choose one of more.
Take to thee from among the cherubimThy choice of flaming warriors. Milton.
Either but one man, or all men are kings: take which you please it dissolves the bonds of government. Locke.
 To copy.
Our phænix queen was pourtray'd too so bright,Beauty alone cou'd beauty take so right. Dryden.
 To convey; to carry; to transport.
Carry sir John Falstaff to the fleet,Take all his company along with him. Shakesp. Henry IV.
He sat him down in a street; for no man took them into his house to lodging. Judges xix. 15.
 To fasten on; to seize.
Wheresoever he taketh him he teareth him; and he foameth. Mark ix. 18.
No temptation hath taken you, but such as is common to man. 1 Cor. x. 13.
When the frost and rain have taken them they grow dangerous. Temple.
At first they warm, then scorch, and then they take,Now with long necks from side to side they feed;At length grown strong their mother-size forsake,And a new colony of flames succeed. Dryden.
No beast will eat sour grass till the frost hath taken it. Mort.
In burning of stubble, take care to plow the land up round the field, that the fire may not take the hedges. Mortimer.
 Not to refuse; to accept.
Take no satisfaction for the life of a murderer, he shall be surely put to death. Num. xxxv. 31.
Thou tak'st thy mother's word too far, said he,And hast usurp'd thy boasted pedigree. Dryden.
He that should demand of hm how begetting a child gives the father absolute power over him, will find him answer nothing: we are to take his word for this. Locke.
Who will not receive clipped money whilst he sees the great receipt of the exchequer admits it, and the bank and goldsmiths will take it of him. Locke.
 To adopt.
I will take you to me for a people, and I will be to you a God. Exod. vi. 7.
 To change with respect to place.
When he departed, he took out two pence, and gave them to the host. Luke x. 35.
He put his hand into his bosom; and when he took it out, it was leprous. Exod. iv. 6.
If you slit the artery, thrust a pipe into it, and cast a strait ligature upon that part containing the pipe, the artery will not beat below the ligature; yet do but take it off, and it will beat immediately. Ray.
Lovers flung themselves from the top of the precipice into the sea, where they were sometimes taken up alive. Addison.
 To separate.
A multitude, how great soever, brings not a man any nearer to the end of the inexhaustible stock of number, where still there remains as much to be added as if none were taken out. Locke.
The living fabrick now in pieces take,Of every part due observation make;All which such art discovers. Blackmore.
 To admit.
Let not a widow be taken into the number under threescore. 1 Tim. v. 9.
Though so much of heav'n appears in my make,The foulest impressions I easily take. Swift.
 To persue; to go in.
                    He alone,To find where Adam shelter'd, took his way. Milton.
To the port she takes her way,And stands upon the margin of the sea. Dryden.
Give me leave to seize my destin'd prey,And let eternal justice take the way. Dryden.
It was her fortune once to take her wayAlong the sandy margin of the sea. Dryden.
 To receive any temper or disposition of mind.
They shall not take shame. Mic. ii. 6.
Thou hast scourged me, and hast taken pity on me. Tob.
They take delight in approaching to God. Isa. lviii. 2.
Take a good heart, O Jerusalem. Bar. iv. 30.
Men die in desire of some things which they take to heart. Bacon.
Few are so wicked as to take delightIn crimes unprofitable. Dryden.
Children, if kept out of ill company, will take a pride to behave themselves prettily, perceiving themselves esteemed. Locke on Education.
 To endure; to bear.
I can be as quiet as any body with those that are quarrelsome, and be as troublesome as another when I meet with those that will take it. L'Estrange.
Won't you then take a jest? Spectator, № 422.
He met with such a reception as those only deserve who are content to take it. Swift's Miscel.
 To draw; to derive.
The firm belief of a future judgment, is the most forcible motive to a good life; because taken from this consideration of the most lasting happiness and misery. Tillotson.
 To leap; to jump over.
That hand which had the strength, ev'n at your door,To cudgel you, and make you take the hatch. Shakesp.
 To assume.
                Fit you to the custom,And take t'ye as your predecessors have,Your honour with your form. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
I take liberty to say, that these propositions are so far from having an universal assent, that to a great part of mankind they are not known. Locke.
 To allow; to admit.
Take not any term, howsoever authorized by the language of the schools, to stand for any thing till you have an idea of it. Locke.
Chemists take, in our present controversy, something for granted which they ought to prove. Boyle.
 To receive with fondness.
I lov'd you still, and took your weak excuses,Took you into my bosom. Dryden.
 To carry out for use.
He commanded them that they should take nothing for their journey, save a staff. Mar. vi. 8.
 To suppose; to receive in thought; to entertain in opinion.
                This I take itIs the main motive of our preparations. Shakespeare.
The spirits that are in all tangible bodies are scarce known. Sometimes they take them for vacuum, whereas they are the most active of bodies. Bacon's Nat. Hist.
The farmer took himself to have deserved as much as any man, in contributing more, and appearing sooner, in their first approach towards rebellion. Clarendon.
Is a man unfortunate in marriage? Still it is because he was deceived; and so took that for virtue and affection which was nothing but vice in a disguise. South.
Our depraved appetites cause us often to take that for true imitation of nature which has no resemblance of it. Dryden.
So soft his tresses, fill'd with trickling pearl,You'd doubt his sex, and take him for a girl. Tate.
Time is taken for so much of infinite duration, as is measured out by the great bodies of the universe. Locke.
They who would advance in knowledge, should lay down this as a fundamental rule, not to take words for things. Locke.
Few will take a proposition which amounts to no more than this, that God is pleased with the doings of what he himself commands for an innate moral principle, since it teaches so little. Locke.
Some tories will take you for a whig, some whigs will take you for a tory. Pope.
As I take it, the two principal branches of preaching are, to tell the people what is their duty, and then to convince them that it is so. Swift.
 To direct.
Where injur'd Nisus takes his airy course,Hence trembling Scylla flies and shuns his foe. Dryden.
 To separate for one's self from any quantity; to remove for one's self from any place.
I will take of them for priests. Isa. lxvi. 21.
Hath God assayed to take a nation from the midst of another. Deut. iv. 34.
I might have taken her to me to wife. Gen. xii. 19.
Enoch walked with God, and he was not, for God took him. Gen. v. 24.
The Lord took of the spirit that was upon him, and gave it unto the seventy elders.
Four heifers from his female store he took. Dryden.
 Not to leave; not to omit.
The discourse here is about ideas, which he says are real things, and we see in God: in taking this along with me, to make it prove any thing to his purpose, the argument must stand thus. Locke.
Young gentlemen ought not only to take along with them a clear idea of the antiquities on medals and figures, but likewise to exercise their arithmetick in reducing the sums of money to those of their own country. Arbuthnot on Coins.
 To receive payments.
Never a wife leads a better life than she does; do what she will, take all, pay all. Shakespeare.
 To obtain by mensuration.
The knight coming to the taylor's to take measure of his gown, perceiveth the like gown cloth lying there. Camden.
With a two foot rule in his hand measuring my walls, he took the dimensions of the room. Swift.
 To withdraw.
Honeycomb, on the verge of threescore, took me aside, and asked me whether I would advise him to marry? Spectat.
 To seize with a transitory impulse; to affect so as not to last.
Tiberius, noted for his niggardly temper, only gave his attendants their diet; but once he was taken with a fit of generosity, and divided them into three classes. Arbuthnot.
 To comprise; to comprehend.
We always take the account of a future state into our schemes about the concerns of this world. Atterbury.
Had those who would persuade us that there are innate principles, not taken them together in gross, but considered separately the parts, they would not have been so forward to believe they were innate. Locke.
 To have recourse to.
A sparrow took a bush just as an eagle made a stoop at an hare. L'Estrange.
The cat presently takes a tree, and sees the poor fox torn to pieces. L'Estrange.
 To produce; or suffer to be produced.
No purposes whatsoever which are meant for the good of that land will prosper, or take good effect. Spenser.
 To catch in the mind.
These do best who take material hints to be judged by history. Locke.
 To hire; to rent.
If three ladies, like a luckless play,Takes the whole house upon the poet's day. Pope.
 To engage in; to be active in.
Question your royal thoughts, make the case yours;Be now the father, and propose a son;Behold yourself so by a son disdain'd;And then imagine me taking your part,And in your pow'r so silencing your son. Shak. Henry IV.
 To suffer; to support.
In streams, my boy, and rivers take thy chance,There swims, said he, thy whole inheritance. Addison.
Now take your turn; and, as a brother shou'd,Attend your brother to the Stygian flood. Dryden's Æn.
 To admit in copulation.
Five hundred asses yearly took the horse,Producing mules of greater speed and force. Sandys.
 To catch eagerly.
Drances took the word; who grudg'd, long since,The rising glories of the Daunian prince. Dryden.
 To use as an oath or expression.
Thou shalt not take the name of the Lord in vain. Exod.
 To seize as a disease.
They that come abroad after these showers are commonly taken with sickness. Bacon.
I am taken on the sudden with a swimming in my head. Dryden.
 To Take away. To deprive of.
If any take away from the book of this prophecy, God shall take away his part out of the book of life. Rev. xx. 19.
The bill for taking away the votes of bishops was called a bill for taking away all temporal jurisdiction. Clarendon.
Many dispersed objects breed confusion, and take away from the picture that grave majesty which gives beauty to the piece. Dryden.
You should be hunted like a beast of prey,By your own law I take your life away. Dryden.
The fun'ral pomp which to your kings you pay,Is all I want, and all you take away. Dryden's Æn.
One who gives another any thing, has not always a right to take it away again. Locke.
Not foes nor fortune takes this pow'r away,And is my Abelard less kind than they. Pope.
 To Take away. To set aside; to remove.
If we take away all consciousness of pleasure and pain, it will be hard to know wherein to place personal identity. Locke.
 To Take care. To be careful; to be solicitous for; to superintend.
Thou shalt not muzzle the ox that treadeth out the corn. Doth God take care for oxen? 1 Cor. ix. 9.
 To Take care. To be cautious; to be vigilant.

 To Take course. To have recourse to measures.
They meant to take a course to deal with particulars by reconcilements, and cared not for any head. Bacon.
The violence of storming is the course which God is forced to take for the destroying, but cannot, without changing the course of nature, for the converting of sinners. Hammond.
 To Take down. To crush; to reduce; to suppress.
Do you think he is now so dangerous an enemy as he is counted, or that it is so hard to take him down as some suppose? Spenser on Ireland.
Take down their mettle, keep them lean and bare. Dryd.
Lacqueys were never so saucy and pragmatical as now, and he should be glad to see them taken down. Addison.
 To Take down. To swallow; to take by the mouth.
We cannot take down the lives of living creatures, which some of the Paracelsians say, if they could be taken down, would make us immortal: the next for subtilty of operation, to take bodies putrefied, such as may be easily taken. Bacon.
 To Take from. To derogate; to detract.
It takes not from you, that you were born with principles of generosity; but it adds to you that you have cultivated nature. Dryden.
 To Take from. To deprive of.
Conversation will add to their knowledge, but be too apt to take from their virtue. Locke.
Gentle gods take my breath from me. Shakespeare.
I will smite thee, and take thine head from thee. 1 Sam.
 To Take heed. To be cautious; to beware.
Take heed of a mischievous man. Ecclus. xi. 33.
                Take heed lest passionSway thy judgment to do ought. Milton.
Children to serve their parents int'rest live,Take heed what doom against yourself you give. Dryden.
 To Take heed to. To attend.
Nothing sweeter than to take heed unto the commandments of the Lord. Ecclus. xxiii. 27.
 To Take in. To comprise; to comprehend.
These heads are sufficient for the explication of this whole matter; taking in some additional discourses, which make the work more even. Burnet's Theory of the Earth.
This love of our country takes in our families, friends, and acquaintance. Addison.
The disuse of the tucker has enlarged the neck of a fine woman, that at present it takes in almost half the body. Add.
Of these matters no satisfactory account can be given by any mechanical hypothesis, without taking in the superintendence of the great Creator. Derham's Physico-Theol.
 To Take in. To admit.
An opinion brought into his head by course, because he heard himself called a father, rather than any kindness that he found in his own heart, made him take us in. Sidney.
A great vessel full being drawn into bottles, and then the liquor put again into the vessel, will not fill the vessel again so full as it was, but that it may take in more. Bacon.
Porter was taken in not only as a bed-chamber servant, but as an useful instrument for his skill in the Spanish. Wotton.
Let fortune empty her whole quiver on me,I have a soul, that, like an ample shield,Can take in all; and verge enough for more. Dryden.
The sight and touch take in from the same object different ideas. Locke.
There is the same irregularity in my plantations: I take in none that do not naturally rejoice in the soil. Spectator.
 To Take in. To win.
He sent Asan-aga with the Janizaries; and pieces of great ordnance, to take in the other cities of Tunis. Knolles.
Should a great beauty resolve to take me in with the artillery of her eyes, it would be as vain as for a thief to set upon a new robbed passenger. Suckling.
Open places are easily taken in, and towns not strongly fortified make but a weak resistance. Felton on the Classicks.
 To Take in. To receive.
We went before, and sailed unto Assos, there intending to take in Paul. Acts xx. 13.
That which men take in by education is next to that which is natural. Tillotson's Sermons.
As no acid is in an animal body but must be taken in by the mouth, so if it is not subdued it may get into the blood. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 To Take in. To receive mentally.
Though a created understanding can never take in the fulness of the divine excellencies, yet so much as it can receive is of greater value than any other object. Hale.
The idea of extension joins itself so inseparably with all visible qualities, that it suffers to see no one without taking in impressions of extension too. Locke.
It is not in the power of the most enlarged understanding to frame one new simple idea in the mind, not taken in by the ways afore-mentioned. Locke.
A man can never have taken in his full measure of knowledge before he is hurried off the stage. Addison's Spect.
Let him take in the instructions you give him in a way suited to his natural inclination. Watts.
Some bright genius can take in a long train of propositions. Watts.
 To Take oath. To swear.
The king of Babylon is come to Jerusalem, and hath taken of the king's seed, and of him taken an oath. Ezek.
We take all oath of secrecy, for the concealing of those inventions which we think fit to keep secret. Bacon.
 To Take off. To invalidate; to destroy; to remove.
You must forsake this room and go with us;Your power and your command is taken off,And Cassio rules in Cyprus. Shakespeare's Othello.
                      The cruel ministersTook off her life. Shakespeare.
If the heads of the tribes can be taken off, and the missed multitude return to their obedience, such an extent of mercy is honourable. Bacon's Advice to Villiers.
Sena loseth its windiness by decocting; and subtile or windy spirits are taken off by incension or evaporation. Bacon.
To shop schisms, take off the principal authors by winning and advancing them, rather than enrage them by violence. Bac.
What taketh off the objection is, that in judging scandal we are to look to the cause whence it cometh. Bishop Sanderson.
The promises, the terrors, or the authority of the commander, must be the topick whence that argument is drawn; and all force of these is taken off by this doctrine. Hammond.
It will not be unwelcome to these worthies, who endeavour the advancement of learning, as being likely to find a clear progression when so many untruths are taken off. Brown.
This takes not off the force of our former evidence. Still.
If the mark, by hindering its exportation, makes it less valuable, the melting pot can easily take it off. Locke.
A man's understanding failing him, would take off that presumption most men have of themselves. Locke.
It shews virtue in the fairest light, and takes off from the deformity of vice. Addison.
When we would take off from the reputation of an action, we ascribe it to vain glory. Addison.
This takes off from the elegance of our tongue, but expresses our ideas in the readiest manner. Addison.
The justices decreed, to take off a halfpeny in a quart from the price of ale. Swift's Miscel.
How many lives have been lost in hot blood, and how many likely to be taken off in cold. Blount to Pope.
Favourable names are put upon ill ideas, to take off the odium. Watts.
 To Take off. To with-hold; to withdraw.
He perceiving that we were willing to say somewhat, in great courtesy took us off, and condescended to ask us questions. Bacon.
Your present distemper is not so troublesome, as to take you off from all satisfaction. Wake.
There is nothing more resty and ungovernable than our thoughts: they will not be directed what objects to pursue, nor be taken off from those they have once fixed on; but run away with a man in pursuit of those ideas they have in view, let him do what he can. Locke.
Keep foreign ideas from taking off our minds from its present pursuit. Locke.
 To Take off. To swallow.
Were the pleasure of drinking accompanied, the moment a man takes off his glass, with that sick stomach which, in some men, follows not many hours after, nobody would ever let wine touch his lips. Locke.
 To Take off. To purchase.
Corn, in plenty, the labourer will have at his own rate, else he'll not take it off the farmer's hands for wages. Locke.
The Spaniards having no commodities that we will take off, above the value of one hundred thousand pounds per annum, cannot pay us. Locke.
There is a project on foot for transporting our best wheaten straw to Dunstable, and obliging us to take off yearly so many ton of straw hats. Swift's Miscel.
 To Take off. To copy.
Take off all their models in wood. Addison.
 To Take off. To find place for.
The multiplying of nobility brings a state to necessity; and, in like manner, when more are bred scholars than preferments can take off. Bacon's Essays.
 To Take off. To remove.
When Moses went in, he took the vail off until he came out. Exod. xxxiv. 34.
If any would reign and take up all the time, let him take them off and bring others on. Bacon.
He has taken you off, by a peculiar instance of his mercy, from the vanities and temptations of the world. Wake.
 To Take order with. To check; to take course with.
Though he would have turned his teeth upon Spain, yet he was taken order with before it came to that. Bacon.
 To Take out. To remove from within any place.
                      Griefs are green;And all thy friends which thou must make thy friendsHave but their stings and teeth newly ta'en out. Shakesp.
 To Take part. To share.
Take part in rejoicing for the victory over the Turks. Pope.
 To Take place. To prevail; to have effect.
Where arms take place, all other pleas are vain;Love taught me force, and force shall love maintain. Dry.
The debt a man owes his father takes place, and gives the father a right to inherit. Locke.
 To Take up. To borrow upon credit or interest.
The smooth pates now wear nothing but high shoes; and if a man is through with them in honest taking up, they stand upon security. Shakespeare.
We take up corn for them, that we may eat and live. Neh.
When Winter shuts the seas, she to the merchant goes,Rich crystals of the rock she takes up there,Huge agat vases, and old china ware. Dryden's Juvenal.
I have anticipated already, and taken up from Boccace before I come to him. Dryden's Fables.
Men, for want of due payment, are forced to take up the necessaries of life at almost double value. Swift.
 To be ready for; to engage with.
                                        His divisionsAre, one power against the French,And one against Glendower; perforce, a thirdMust take up us. Shakesp. Henry IV.
 To Take up. To apply to the use of.
We took up arms not to revenge ourselves,But free the commonwealth. Addison.
 To Take up. To begin.
They shall take up a lamentation for me. Ezek. xxv. 17.
Princes friendship, which they take up upon the accounts of judgment and merit, they most times lay down out of humour. South's Serm.
 To Take up. To fasten with a ligature passed under.
A large vessel opened by incision must be taken up before you proceed. Sharp.
 To Take up. To engross; to engage.
                    Take my esteem,If from my heart you ask, or hope for more,I grieve the place is taken up before. Dryden.
I intended to have left the stage, to which my genius never much inclined me, for a work which would have taken up my life in the performance. Dryden's Juvenal.
Over-much anxiety in worldly things takes up the mind, hardly admitting so much as a thought of heaven. Duppa.
To understand fully his particular calling in the commonwealth, and religion, which is his calling, as he is a man, takes up his whole time. Locke.
Every one knows that mines alone furnish these: but withal, countries stored with mines are poor; the digging and refining of these metals taking up the labour, and wasting the number of the people. Locke.
We were so confident of success, that most of my fellow-soldiers were taken up with the same imaginations. Addison.
The following letter is from an artist, now taken up with this invention. Addison.
There is so much time taken up in the ceremony, that before they enter on their subject the dialogue is half ended. Addison on ancient Medals.
The affairs of religion and war took up Constantine so much, that he had not time to think of trade. Arbuthnot.
When the compass of twelve books is taken up in these, the reader will wonder by what methods our author could prevent being tedious. Pope's Essay on Homer.
 To Take up. To have final recourse to.
Arnobius asserts, that men of the finest parts and learning, rhetoricians, lawyers, physicians, despising the sentiments they had been once fond of, took up their rest in the Christian religion. Addison on the Christian Religion.
 To Take up. To seize; to catch; to arrest.
Though the sheriff have this authority to take up all such stragglers, and imprison them; yet shall he not work that terror in their hearts that a marshal will, whom they know to have power of life and death. Spenser.
I was taken up for laying them down. Shakespeare.
                    You have taken up,Under the counterfeited zeal of God,The subjects of his substitute, and here upswarm'd them. Shakespeare.
 To Take up. To admit.
The ancients took up experiments upon credit, and did build great matters upon them. Bacon's Nat. Hist.
 To Take up. To answer by reproving; to reprimand.
One of his relations took him up roundly, for stooping so much below the dignity of his profession. L'Estrange.
 To Take up. To begin where the former left off.
The plot is purely fiction; for I take it up where the history has laid it down. Dryden's Don Sebastian.
Soon as the evening shades prevail,The moon takes up the wond'rous tale,And nightly to the list'ning earthRepeats the story of her birth. Addison's Spect.
 To Take up. To lift.
Take up these cloaths here quickly:Where's the cowlstaff? Shakespeare.
The least things are taken up by the thumb and forefinger; when we would take up a greater quantity, we would use the thumb and all the fingers. Ray.
Milo took up a calf daily on his shoulders, and at last arrived at firmness to bear the bull. Watts.
 To Take up. To occupy.
The people by such thick throngs swarmed to the place, that the chambers which opened towards the scaffold were taken up. Hayward.
All vicious enormous practices are regularly consequent, where the other hath taken up the lodging. Hammond.
Committees, for the convenience of the common-council who took up the Guild-hall, sat in Grocer's-hall. Clarendon.
When my concernment takes up no more room than myself, then so long as I know where to breathe, I know also where to be happy. South's Sermons.
These things being compared, notwithstanding the room that mountains take up on the dry land, there would be at least eight oceans required. Burnet's Theory of the Earth.
When these waters were annihilated, so much other matter must be created to take up their places. Burnet.
Princes were so taken up with wars, that few could write or read besides those of the long robes. Temple.
The buildings about took up the whole space. Arbuthnot.
 To Take up. To accommodate; to adjust.
I have his horse to take up the quarrel. Shakespeare.
The greatest empires have had their rise from the pretence of taking up quarrels, or keeping the peace. L'Estrange.
 To Take up. To comprise.
I prefer in our countryman the noble poem of Palemon and Arcite, which is perhaps not much inferior to the Ilias, only it takes up seven years. Dryden's Fables.
 To Take up. To adopt; to assume.
God's decrees of salvation and damnation have been taken up by some of the Romish and Reformed churches, affixing them to mens particular entities, absolutely considered. Hamm.
The command in war is given to the strongest, or to the bravest; and in peace taken up and exercised by the boldest. Temple.
Assurance is properly that confidence which a man takes up of the pardon of his sins, upon such grounds as the scripture lays down. South's Sermons.
The French and we still change, but here's the curse,They change for better, and we change for worse.They take up our old trade of conquering,And we are taking their's to dance and sing. Dryden.
He that will observe the conclusions men take up, must be satisfied they are not all rational. Locke.
Celibacy, in the church of Rome, was commonly forced, and taken up, under a bold vow. Atterbury.
Lewis Baboon had taken up the trade of clothier, without serving his time. Arbuthnot's Hist. of John Bull.
Every man takes up those interests in which his humour engages him. Pope.
If those proceedings were observed, morality and religion would soon become fashionable court virtues, and be taken up as the only methods to get or keep employments. Swfit.
 To Take up. To collect; to exact a tax.
This great bassa was born in a poor country village, and in his childhood taken from his Cristian parents, by such as take up the tribute children. Knolles's Hist. of the Turks.
 To Take upon. To appropriate to; to assume; to admit to be imputed to.
If I had no more wit than he, to take a fault upon me that he did, he had been hang'd for't. Shakespeare.
He took not on him the nature of angels, but the seed of Abraham. Heb. ii. 16.
For confederates, I will not take upon me the knowledge how the princes of Europe, at this day, stand affected towards Spain. Bacon's War with Spain.
Would I could your suff'rings bear;Or once again could some new way invent,To take upon myself your punishment. Dryden.
She loves me, ev'n to suffer for my sake;And on herself would my refusal take. Dryden.
 To Take upon. To assume; to claim authority.
These dangerous, unsafe lunes i' th' king! beshrew them,He must be told on't, and he shall; the officeBecomes a woman best: I'll take't upon me. Shakespeare.
Look that you take upon you as you should. Shakespeare.
This every translator taketh upon himself to do. Felton.

Tangent
Tángent n.s. [tangent, Fr. tangens, Lat.]
Tangent, in trigonometry, is a right line perpendicularly raised on the extremity of a radius, and which touches a circle so as not to cut it; but yet intersects another line without the circle called a secant that is drawn from the centre, and which cuts the arc to which it is a tangent. Trevoux.
Nothing in this hypothesis can retain the planets in their orbs, but they would immediately desert them and the neighbourhood of the sun, and vanish away in tangents to their several circles into the mundane space. Bentley's Serm.

Tantalism
Tántalism. n.s. [from tantalize.] A punishment like that of Tantalus.
 A lively representation of a person lying under the torments of such a tantalism, or platonick hell. Addison's Spectat.

Tantalize
To Tántalize. v.a. [from Tantalus, whose punishment was to starve among fruits and water which he could not touch.] To torment by the shew of pleasures which cannot be reached.
             Thy vain desires, at strife Within themselves, have tantaliz'd thy life. Dryden.
 The maid once sped was not suffered to tantalize the male part of the commonwealth. Addison.

Tantivy
Tántivy. adv. [from the note of a hunting horn, so expressed in articulate sounds; from tantâ vi, says Skinner.] To ride tantivy is to ride with great speed.

Tantling
Tántling. n.s. [from Tantalus.] One seized with hopes of pleasure unattainable.
                                 Hard life, To be still hot Summer's tantlings, and The shrinking slaves of Winter. Shakespeare.

Tar (noun 1)
Tar. n.s. [tare, Saxon; tarre, Dutch; tiere, Danish.] Liquid pitch; the turpentine of the pine or fir drained out by fire.
 Then, foaming tar, their bridles they would champ, And trampling the fine element would fiercely ramp. Spens.
 A man will not lose a hog for a halfpennyworth of tar. Camden's Remains.
 Some stir the melted tar. Thomson's Summer.

Tar (noun 2)
Tar. n.s. [from tar used in ships.] A sailor; a seaman in contempt.
 In senates bold, and fierce in war, A land commander, and a tar. Swift's Miscel.

Tar (verb)
To Tar. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To smear over with tar.

 To teaze; to provoke. [ταράττω.]
 There has been much to do on both sides; and the nation holds it no sin to tarre them on to controversy. Shakesp.
 Two curs shall tame each other; pride alone Must tar the mastiffs on, as 'twere the bone. Shakespeare.

Tarantula
Tarántula. n.s. [Italian; tarentule, French.] An insect whose bite is only cured by musick.
 This word, lover, did no less pierce poor Pyrocles than the right tune of musick toucheth him that is sick of the tarantula. Sidney.
 He that uses the word tarantula, without having any idea of what it stands for, means nothing at all by it. Locke.

Targum
Tárgum. n.s. [.תרגום] A paraphrase on the pentateuch in the Chaldee language.

Tariff
Táriff. n.s. [perhaps a Spanish word; tarif, Fr.] A cartel of commerce.
 This branch of our trade was regulated by a tariff, or declaration of the duties of import and export. Addison.

Tarn
Tarn. n.s. [tiorn, Islandick.] A bog; a fen; a marsh; a pool; a quagmire.

Tarnish (verb active)
To Tárnish. v.a. [ternir, French.] To sully; to soil; to make not bright.
 Let him pray for resolution, that he may discover nothing that may discredit the cause, tarnish the glory, and weaken the example of the suffering. Collier.
 Low waves the rooted forest, vex'd, and sheds What of its tarnish'd honours yet remain. Thomson.

Tarnish (verb neuter)
To Tárnish. v.n. To lose brightness.
 If a fine object should tarnish by having a great many see it, or the musick should run mostly into one man's ears, these satisfactions would be made inclosure. Collier of Envy.

Tarpawling
Tarpáwling. n.s. [from tar.]

 Hempen cloath smeered with tar.
 Some the gall'd ropes with dauby marling bind, Or searcloth masts with strong tarpawling coats. Dryden.
 A sailor in contempt.
 Was any thing wanting to the extravagance of this age, but the making of a living tarpawlin and a swabber the hero of a tragedy. Dennis.

Tarragon
Tárragon. n.s. A plant called herb-dragon.

Tarriance
Tárriance. n.s. [from tarry.] Stay; delay; perhaps sojourn.
                     Dispatch me hence: Come, answer not; but do it presently, I am impatient of my tarriance. Shakespeare.

Tarry (verb neuter)
To Tárry. v.n. [targir, French.]

 To stay; to continue in a place.
 Tarry I here, I but attend on death; But fly I hence, I fly away from life. Shakespeare.
 To delay; to be long in coming.
 Thou art my deliverer, make no tarrying, O God. Psal.
 Who hath woe and redness of eyes? they that tarry long at the wine. Prov. xxiii. 30.
 Tarry ye here for us until we come again. Exod. xxiv. 14.
 I yet am tender, young, and full of fear, And dare not die, but fain would tarry here. Dryden.

Tax (noun)
Tax. n.s. [tâsg, Welsh; taxe, French; taxe, Dutch.]

 An impost; a tribute imposed; an excise: a tallage.
He says Horace, being the son of a tax gatherer or collector, smells everywhere of the meanness of his birth. Dryden.
With wars and taxes others waste their own,And houses burn, and household gods deface,To drink in bowls which glittering gems enchase. Dryden.
The tax upon tillage was two shillings in the pound in arable land, and four in plantations: this tax was often levied in kind upon corn, and called decumæ or tithes. Arbuthnot.
 [Taxo, Lat.] Charge; censure.
He could not without grief of heart, and without some tax upon himself and his ministers for the not executing the laws, look upon the bold licence of some pamphlets. Clarendon.

Tax (verb)
To Tax. v.a. [taxer, Fr. from the noun.]

 To load with imposts.
Jehoiakim gave the silver and gold to Pharaoh, but he taxed the land to give the money. 2 Kings xxiii. 35.
 [Taxo, Lat.] To charge; to censure; to accuse. It has of or with before the fault imputed, and is used both of persons and things.
How many hath he killed? I promised to eat all of his killing. — Niece, you tax signior Benedick too much; but he'll be meet with you. Shakespeare.
I am not justly to be taxed with any presumption for meddling with matters wherein I have no dealing. Raleigh.
Tax not divine disposal, wisest menHave err'd, and by bad women been deceiv'd. Milton.
They cannot tax others omissions towards them without a tacit reproach of their own. Decay of Piety.
He taxed not Homer nor Virgil for interesting their gods in the wars of Troy and Italy; neither would he have taxed Milton for his choice of a supernatural argument. Dryden.
Mens virtues I have commended as freely as I have taxed their crimes. Dryden.
He call'd him back aloud, and tax'd his fear;And sure enough he heard, but durst not hear. Dryden.
Like some rich and mighty murderer,Too great for prison which he breaks with gold,Who fresher for new mischief does appear,And dares the world to tax him with the old. Dryden.
If this be chance, it is extraordinary; and I dare not call it more, for fear of being taxed with superstition. Dryden.
If he taxes both of long delay,My guilt is less, who sooner came away. Dryden.
This salutation cannot be taxed with flattery, since it was directed to a prince, of whom it had been happy for Rome if he had never been born, or if he had never died. Addison.

Techy
Téchy. adj. Peevish; fretful; irritable; easily made angry; froward.
 I cannot come to Cressid but by Pandar, And he is as techy to be woo'd to wooe, As she is stubborn-chaste against all sute. Shakespeare.
 When it did taste the wormwood on the nipple, and felt it bitter, pretty fool, to see it techy, and fall out with the dug. Shakespeare's Romeo and Juliet.

Teen (noun)
Teen n.s. [tinan, Saxon, to kindle; tenen, Flemish, to vex; teonan, Saxon, injuries.] Sorrow; grief.
                    Arrived thereThat barehead knight, for dread and doleful teenWould fain have fled, ne durst approachen near. Fa. Qu.
Fry not in heartless grief and doleful teen. Spenser.
                My heart bleedsTo think o' th' teene that I have turn'd you to. Shakesp.
Eighty odd years of sorrow have I seen,And each hour's joy wreck'd with a week of teen. Shak.

Teen (verb)
To Teen. v.a. [from tinan, to kindle, Saxon.] To excite; to provoke to do a thing. Spenser.

Teens
Teens. n.s. [from teen for ten.] The years reckoned by the termination teen; as, thirteen, fourteen.
Our author would excuse these youthful scenes,Begotten at his entrance, in his teens;Some childish fancies may approve the toy,Some like the muse the more for being a boy. Granville.

Teh-he
To Teh-he. v.n. [a cant word made from the sound.] To laugh with a loud and more insolent kind of cachinnation; to titter.
They laugh'd and teh-he'd with derision,To see them take your deposition. Hudibras, p. iii.

Telary
Télary. adj. [tela, a web, Lat.] Spinning webs.
The pictures of telary spiders, and their position in the web, is commonly made lateral, and regarding the horizon; although we shall commonly find it downward, and their heads respecting the center. Brown's Vulgar Err. b. v.

Telescope
Télescope. n.s. [telescope, Fr. τέλος and σκοπέω.] A long glass by which distant objects are viewed.
The telescope discovers to us distant wonders in the heavens, and shews the milky way, and the bright cloudy spots, in a very dark sky, to be a collection of little stars. Watts.

Telescopical
Telescópical. adj. [from telescope.] Belonging to a telescope; seeing at a distance.

Tempest (noun)
Témpest. n.s. [tempeste, Fr. tempestas, Lat.]

 The utmost violence of the wind; the names by which the wind is called according to the gradual encrease of its force seems to be, a breeze; a gale; a gust; a storm; a tempest.
 I have seen tempests, when the scolding winds Have riv'd the knotty oaks. Shakesp. Julius Cæsar.
 Some have been driven by tempest to the south. Abbot.
 What at first was call'd a gust, the sameHath now a storm's, anon a tempest's name. Donne.
 We, caught in a fiery tempest, shall be hurl'dEach on his rock transfix'd. Milton.
                 With clouds and stormsAround thee thrown, tempest o'er tempest roll'd,Thou humblest nature with thy northern blast. Thomson.
 Any tumult; commotion; perturbation.
             The tempest in my mindDoth from my senses take all feeling else,Save what beats there. Shakespeare's King Lear.

Tempestivity
Tempestívity. n.s. [tempestivus, Lat.] Seasonableness.
 Since their dispersion the constitutions of countries admit not such tempestivity of harvest. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Tempestuous
Tempéstuous. adj. [tempestueux, Fr. from tempest.] Stormy; turbulent.
 Tempestuous fortune hath spent all her spight, And thrilling sorrow thrown his utmost dart. Fairy Qu.
 Which of them rising with the sun or fallingShould prove tempestuous. Milton.
 Her looks grow black as a tempestuous wind, Some raging thoughts are rowling in her mind. Dryden.
 Pompey, when dissuaded from embarking because the weather was tempestuous, replied, My voyage is necessary, my life is not so. Collier on the Value of Life.

Templar
Témplar. n.s. [from the Temple, an house near the Thames, anciently belonging to the knights templars, originally from the temple of Jerusalem.] A student in the law.
 Wits and templars ev'ry sentence raise,And wonder with a foolish face of praise. Pope's Epist.

Temple
Témple. n.s. [temple, Fr. templum, Lat.]

 A place appropriated to acts of religion.
                         The honour'd gods Throng our large temples with the shews of peace. Shak.
 Here we have no temple but the wood, no assembly but hornbeasts. Shakespeare's As you like it.
Most sacrilegious murther hath broke opeThe lord's anointed temple, and stole thenceThe life o' th' building. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
         This guest of Summer, The temple haunting martlet. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
 [Tempora, Latin.] The upper part of the hides of the head where the pulse is felt.
                     Her sunny locks Hang on her temples like a golden fleece. Shakespeare.
 We may apply intercipients of mastich upon the temples; frontals also may be applied. Wiseman's Surgery.
 To procure sleep, he uses the scratching of the temples and ears; that even mollifies wild beasts. Arbuthnot.
 The weapon enter'd close above his ear, Cold through his temples glides the whizzing spear. Pope.

Templet
Témplet. n.s. A piece of timber in a building.
 When you lay any timber on brick-work, as linteols over windows, or templets under girders, lay them in loom. Moxon.

Temporal
Témporal. adj. [temporal, Fr. temporalis, low Latin.]

 Measured by time; not eternal.
 As there they sustain temporal life, so here they would learn to make provision for eternal. Hooker.
 Secular; not ecclesiastical.
 This sceptre shews the force of temporal power, The attribute to awe and majesty, Wherein doth sit the dread of kings. Shakespeare.
 All the temporal lands, which men devout By testament have given to the church, Would they strip from us. Shakesp. Henry V.
 All temporal power hath been wrested from the clergy, and much of their ecclesiastick. Swift.
 Not spiritual.
 Call not every temporal end a defiling of the intention, but only when it contradicts the ends of God, or when it is principally intended: for sometimes a temporal end is part of our duty; and such are all the actions of our calling. Taylor.
 Our petitions to God with regard to temporals, must be that medium of convenience proportioned to the several conditions of life. Roger's Serm.
 [Temporal, Fr.] Placed at the temples, or upper part of the head.
 Copious bleeding, by opening the temporal arteries, are the most effectual remedies for a phrensy. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Temporary
Témporary. adj. [tempus, Lat.] Lasting only for a limited time.
These temporary truces were soon made and soon broken; he desired a straiter amity. Bacon's Henry VII.
The republick threatened with danger, appointed a temporary dictator, who, when the danger was over, retired again into the community. Addison.

Ten
Ten. adj. [tẏn, Saxon; tien, Dutch.] The decimal number; twice five; the number by which we multiply numbers into new denominations.
Thou shalt have moreThan two tens to a score. Shakesp. King Lear.
Ten hath been extolled as containing even, odd, long, and plain, quadrate and cubical numbers; and Aristotle observed, that Barbarians as well as Greeks used a numeration unto ten. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv.
With twice ten sail I cross'd the Phrygian sea,Scarce seven within your harbour meet. Dryden.
There's a proud modesty in merit,Averse from begging; and resolv'd to payTen times the gift it asks. Dryden's Cleomenes.
                From the soft lyre,Sweet flute, and ten string'd instrument, requireSounds of delight. Prior.
Although English is too little cultivated, yet the faults are nine in ten owing to affectation. Swift's Miscel.

Tender (adjective)
Ténder. adj. [tendre, French.]

 Soft; easily impressed or injured.
The earth brought forth the tender grass. Milton.
From each tender stalk she gathers. Milton.
 Sensible; easily pained; soon sore.
Unneath may she endure the flinty street,To tread them with her tender feeling feet. Shakespeare.
Leah was tender eyed, but Rachael was well-favoured. Gen. xxix. 17.
Our bodies are not naturally more tender than our faces; but by being less exposed to the air, they become less able to endure it. L'Estrange.
The face when we are born is no less tender than any other part of the body: it is use alone hardens it, and makes it more able to endure the cold. Locke on Education.
 Effeminate; emasculate; delicate.
When Cyrus had overcome the Lydians, that were a warlike nation, and devised to bring them to a more peaceable life, instead of their short warlike coat he clothed them in long garments like women, and instead of their warlike musick appointed to them certain lascivious lays, by which their minds were so mollified and abated, that they forgot their former fierceness, and became most tender and effeminate. Spenser on Ireland.
 Exciting kind concern.
                I love Valentine;His life's as tender to me as my soul. Shakespeare.
 Compassionate; anxious for another's good.
The tender kindness of the church it well beseemeth to help the weaker sort, although some few of the perfecter and stronger be for a time displeased. Hooker, b. v.
This not mistrust but tender love injoins. Milton.
Be tender hearted and compassionate towards those in want, and ready to relieve them. Tillotson's Sermons.
 Susceptible of soft passions.
Your tears a heart of flintMight tender make, yet noughtHerein they will prevail. Spenser.
 Amorous; lascivious.
What mad lover ever dy'd,To gain a soft and gentle bride?Or for a lady tender hearted,In purling streams or hemp departed? Hudibras, p. iii.
 Expressive of the softer passions.

 Careful not to hurt, with of.
The civil authority should be tender of the honour of God and religion. Tillotson's Sermons.
As I have been tender of every particular person's reputation, so I have taken care not to give offence. Addison.
 Gentle; mild; unwilling to pain.
Thy tender hefted nature shall not giveThee o'er to harshness; her eyes are fierce, but thineDo comfort and not burn. Shakesp. King Lear.
You, that are thus so tender o'er his follies,Will never do him good. Shakesp. Winter's Tale.
 Apt to give pain.
In things that are tender and upleasing, break the ice by some whose words are of less weight, and reserve the more weighty voice to come in as by chance. Bacon.
 Young; weak: as, tender age.
When yet he was but tender bodied, am other should not sell him. Shakespeare's Coriolanus.

Tenebricose
Tenébricose.Ténebrous.

adj. [tenebricosus, tenebrosus, Latin.] Dark; gloomy.

Tenebrosity
Tenebrósity. n.s. [tenebræ, Lat.] Darkness; gloom.

Tenebrous
Tenébricose.Ténebrous.

adj. [tenebricosus, tenebrosus, Latin.] Dark; gloomy.

Testator
Testátor. n.s. [testator, Lat. testateur, French.] One who leaves a will.
He bringeth arguments from the love or good-will which always the testator bore him. Hooker, b. iii.
The same is the case of a testator giving a legacy by kindness, or by promise and common right. Taylor.

Testatrix
Testátrix. n.s. [Latin.] A woman who leaves a will.

Testudineous
Testudíneous. adj. [testudo, Lat.] Resembling the shell of a tortoise.

Thank (noun)
Thank.Thanks.

n.s. [ðancas, Saxon; dancke, Dutch.] Acknowledgment paid for favour or kindness; expression of gratitude. Thanks is commonly used of verbal acknowledgment, gratitude of real repayment.  It is seldom used in the singular.


 The poorest service is repaid with thanks. Shakespeare.
 Happy be Theseus, our renowned duke. — Thanks, good Egeus, what's the news? Shakespeare.
 The fool saith, I have no thank for all my good deed; and they that eat my bread speak evil of me. Ecclus. xx. 16.
 He took bread, and gave thanks to God in presence of them all. Acts xxvii. 35.
 Thanks be to God, which giveth us the victory. 1 Cor. xv.
 Some embrace suits which never mean to deal effectually in them; but they will win a thank, or take a reward. Bacon.
 For this to th' infinitely good we owe Immortal thanks. Milton.

Thanks
Thank.Thanks.

n.s. [ðancas, Saxon; dancke, Dutch.] Acknowledgment paid for favour or kindness; expression of gratitude. Thanks is commonly used of verbal acknowledgment, gratitude of real repayment.  It is seldom used in the singular.


 The poorest service is repaid with thanks. Shakespeare.
 Happy be Theseus, our renowned duke. — Thanks, good Egeus, what's the news? Shakespeare.
 The fool saith, I have no thank for all my good deed; and they that eat my bread speak evil of me. Ecclus. xx. 16.
 He took bread, and gave thanks to God in presence of them all. Acts xxvii. 35.
 Thanks be to God, which giveth us the victory. 1 Cor. xv.
 Some embrace suits which never mean to deal effectually in them; but they will win a thank, or take a reward. Bacon.
 For this to th' infinitely good we owe Immortal thanks. Milton.

Thanksgiving
Thanksgíving. n.s. [thanks and give.] Celebration of mercy.
 These sacred hymns Christianity hath peculiar to itself, the other being songs too of praise and thanksgiving, wherewith as we serve God so the Jews likewise. Hooker, b. v.
tude; meritorious.
 Of old there were songs of praise and thanksgiving unto God. Neh. xii. 46.
 We should acknowledge our obligations to God for the many favours we receive, by continual praises and thanksgivings. Tillotson's Sermons.

That (pronoun)
That, pronoun. [thata, Gothick; ðæt, Saxon; dat, Dutch.]

 Not this, but the other.
 He wins me by that means I told you. Shakespeare.
        Octavia, not only that, That were excuseable, that and thousands more Of semblable import, but he hath wag'd New wars against Pompey. Shakespeare.
 Which; relating to an antecedent thing.
         You'll rue the time That clogs me with this answer. Shakesp. Macbeth.
 Nothing they but dust can show, Or bones that hasten to be so. Cowley.
 Who; relating to an antecedent person.
 Saints that taught and led the way to heav'n. Tickel.
 It sometimes serves to save the repetition of a word or words foregoing.
 I'll know your business, that I will. Shakesp. Henry IV.
 They said, what is that to us? see thou to that. Matth.
 Ye defraud, and that your brethren. 1 Cor. vi. 8.
 Yet for all that, when they be in the land of their enemies I will not cast them away. Lev. xxvi. 44.
 They weep as if they meant That way at least proud Nabas to prevent. Cowley.
 This runick subject will occur upon that of poetry. Temple.
 What is inviting in this sort of poetry proceeds not so much from the idea of a country life itself, as from that of its tranquility. Pope.
 Opposed to this as the other to one.
 This is not fair; nor profitable that; Nor t'other question proper for debate. Dryden's Persius.
 In this scale gold, in t'other fame does lie, The weight of that mounts this so high. Cowley.
 When this and that relate to foregoing words, this is referred like hic or cecy to the latter, and that like ille or cela to the former.

 Such as.
 By religion is meant a living up to those principles, that is, to act conformably to our best reason, and to live as becomes those who believe a God and a future state. Tillotson.
 That which; what.
 Sir, I think the meat wants that I have. — — Basting. Shakesp. Comedy of Errours.
 The thing.
 The Nazarite hath vowed, besides that that his hand shall get. Num. vi. 21.
 He made that art which was a rage. Cowley.
 The thing which then was.
         Secure proud Nabas slept, And dreamt, vain man, of that day's barb'rous sport. Cowley.
 By way of eminence.
 This is that Jonathan, the joy and grace, That Jonathan in whom does mixt remain All that fond mothers wish. Cowley.
 Hence love himself, that tyrant of my days. Cowley.
 In That. A being.
 Things are preached not in that they are taught, but in that they are published. Hooker, b. v.

Theatre
Théatre. n.s. [theatre, Fr. theatrum, Lat.]

 A place in which shews are exhibited; a playhouse.
 This wise and universal theatre, Presents more woful pageants than the scene Wherein we play. Shakesp. As you like it.
 When the boats came within sixty yards of the pillar, they found themselves all bound, yet so as they might go about, so as they all stood as in a theatre beholding this light. Bacon.
 A place rising by steps like a theatre.
 Shade above shade, a woody theatre Of stateliest view. Milton.
 In the midst of this fair valley stood A native theatre, which rising slow, By just degrees o'erlook'ed the ground below. Dryden.

There
There. adv. [thar, Gothick; ðær, Saxon; daer, Dutch; der, Danish.]

 In that place.
 If they come to sojourn at my house, I'll not be there. Shakespeare's King Lear.
 Exil'd by thee from earth, to deepest hell, In brazen bonds shall barb'rous discord dwell; Gigantick pride, pale terror, gloomy care, And mad ambition shall attend her there. Pope.
 It is opposed to here.
 To see thee fight, to see thee traverse, to see thee here, to see thee there. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
 Could their relishes be as different there as they are here, yet the manna in heaven will suit every palate. Locke.
 Darkness there might well seem twilight here. Milton.
 An exclamation directing something at a distance.
                 Your fury hardens me. A guard there; seize her. Dryden's Aurengzebe.
 It is used at the beginning of a sentence with the appearance of a nominative case, but serves only to throw the nominative behind the verb: as, a man came, or there came a man.  It adds however some emphasis, which, like many other idioms in every language, must be learned by custom, and can hardly be explained.  It cannot always be omitted without harshness: as, in old times there was a great king.
 For reformation of errour there were that thought it a part of Christian charity to instruct them. Hooker.
There cannot in nature be a strength so great, as to make the least moveable to pass in an instant, or all together, through the least place. Digby on the Soul.
There have been that have delivered themselves from their ills by their good fortune or virtue. Suckling.
 In human actions there are no degrees described, but a latitude is indulged. Bishop Taylor.
 Wherever there is sense or perception, there some idea is actually produced. Locke.
 In composition it means that: as thereby, by that.

Thief
Thief. n.s. [thiubs, Gothick; ðeif, Saxon; deif, Dutch. It was anciently written thieof, and so appeareth to have been of two syllables; thie was wont to be taken for thrift, so that thie of is he that takes of or from a man his thie, that is, his thrift or means whereby he thrives.]

 One who takes what belongs to another: the thief steals by secrecy, and the robber by violence; but these senses are confounded.
Take heed, have open eye; for thieves do foot by night. Shakespeare.
This he said because he was a thief, and had the bag. John.
Can you think I owe a thief my life,Because he took it not by lawless force?Am I obliged by that t'assist his rapines,And to maintain his murders? Dryden.
 An excrescence in the snuff of a candle.
Their burning lamps the storm ensuing show,Th' oil sparkles, thieves about the snuff do grow. May.

This
This. pronoun. [ðis, Saxon.]

 That which is present; what is now mentioned.
 Bardolph and Nim had more valour than this, yet they were both hang'd; and so would this be, if he durst steal. Shak.
 Come a little nearer this ways. Shakespeare.
 Within this three mile may you see it coming, I say a moving grove. Shakesp. Macbeth.
Must I endure all this? Shakesp. Julius Cæsar.
This fame shall not comfort us concerning our toil. Gen. v. 29.
 This is not the place for a large reduction. Hale.
 There is a very great inequality among men as to their internal endowments, and their external conditions, in this life. Calamy's Sermons.
 The next future.
 Let not the Lord be angry, and I will speak yet but this once: peradventure ten shall be found there. Gen. xviii. 32.
 This is used for this time.
 By this the vessel half her course had run. Dryden.
 The last past.
 I have not wept this forty years; but now My mother comes afresh into my eyes. Dryden.
 It is often opposed to that.
 As when two winds with rival force contend, This way and that, the wav'ring sails they bend, While freezing Boreas and black Eurus blow, Now here, now there, the reeling vessel throw. Pope.
 According as the small parts of matter are connected together after this or that determinate manner, a body of this or that denomination is produced. Boyle.
 Do we not often hear of this or that young heir? are not his riches and his lewdness talkt of together? South's Serm.
 This way and that the impatient captives tend, And pressing for release the mountains rend. Dryden.
 When this and that respect a former sentence, this relates to the latter, that to the former member.
 Their judgment in this we may not, and in that we need not, follow. Hooker.
 Sometimes it is opposed to the other.
 Consider the arguments which the author had to write this, or to design the other, before you arraign him. Dryden.
 With endless pain, this man persues What, if he gain'd, he could not use: And t'other fondly hopes to see What never was, nor e'er shall be. Prior.

Thou (noun)
Thou. n.s. [þu, Saxon; du, Dutch; in the oblique cases singular thee, þe, Saxon; in the plural ye, ʒe, Saxon; in the oblique cases plural you, eow, Saxon.]

 The second pronoun personal.
Is this a dagger which I see before me,The handle tow'rd my hand? Come let me clutch thee.I have thee not, and yet I see thee still.Art thou not, fatal vision, sensibleTo feeling as to sight. Shakesp. Macbeth.
I am as like to call thee so again,To spit on thee again, to spurn thee too,If thou wilt lend this money lend it notAs to thy friend. Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.
Thou, if there be a thou in this base town,Who dares with angry Eupolis to frown;Who at enormous villany turns pale,And steers against it with a full-blown sail. Dryden.
 It is used only in very familiar or very solemn language. When we speak to equals or superiors we say you; but in solemn language, and in addresses of worship, we say thou.

Thou (verb)
To Thou. v.a. [from thou.] To treat with familiarity.
Taunt him with the licence of ink; if thou thou'st him some thrice, it shall not be amiss. Shakespeare.

Thrift
Thrift. n.s. [from thrive.]

 Profit; gain; riches gotten; state of prospering.
He came out with all his clowns, horst upon such cart jades, and so furnished, as I thought with myself if that were thrift, I wisht none of my friends or subjects ever to thrive. Sidney, b. ii.
                You some permitTo second ills with ills, each worse than other,And make them dreaded to the doer's thrift. Shakespeare.
                Had I but the meansTo hold a rival place with one of them,I have a mind presages me such thrift,That I should be fortunate. Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.
            Should the poor be flatter'd?No; let the candied tongue lick absurd pomp,And crook the pregnant hinges of the knee,Where thrift may follow fawning. Shakesp. Hamlet.
 Parsimony; frugality; good husbandry.
The rest unable to serve any longer, or willing to fall to thrift, prove very good husbands. Spenser on Ireland.
Out of the present sparing and untimely thrift, there grow many future inconveniences and continual charge in repairing and re-edifying such imperfect slight-built vessels. Raleigh.
Thus heaven, though all-sufficient, shows a thriftIn his œconomy, and bounds his gift. Dryden.
 A plant.
The thrift is a plant with a flower gathered into an almost spherical head, furnished with a common scaly empalement: this head is composed of several clove-gilliflower flowers, consisting of several leaves in a proper empalement, shaped like a funnel; in like manner the pointal rises out of the same empalement, and afterwards turns to an oblong seed, wrapt up in the empalement, as in an husk. Miller.

Thrive
To Thrive. v.n. pret. throve, and sometimes less properly thrived. part. thriven. [Of this word there is found no satisfactory etymology: in the northern dialect they use throdden, to make grow; perhaps throve was the original word, from throa, Islandick, to encrease.] To prosper; to grow rich; to advance in any thing desired.
He came forth with his clowns horst on poor cart-jades, and so furnished, that if this be thrift, I wish my subjects never thrive. Sidney.
The better thou thrivest, the gladder am I. Tusser.
If lord Percy thrive not, ere the kingDismiss his power, he means to visit us. Shakespeare.
It grew amongst bushes, where commonly plants do not thrive. Bacon's Nat. Hist. № 620.
            They by vices thrive,Sail on smooth seas, and at their port arrive. Sandys.
O son! why sit we here, each other viewingIdly, while Satan, our great author, thrivesIn other worlds, and happier seat providesFor us, his offspring dear? Milton's Par. Lost, b. x.
Those who have resolved upon the thriving sort of piety, seldom embark all their hopes in one bottom. Decay of Piety.
A careful shepherd not only turns his flock into a common pasture, but with particular advertence observes the thriving of every one. Decay of Piety.
Growth is of the very nature of some things: to be and to thrive is all one with them; and they know no middle season between their spring and their fall. South's Serm.
Experienc'd age in deep despair was lost,To see the rebel thrive, the loyal crost. Dryden.
Seldom a thriving man turns his land into money to make the greater advantage. Locke.
The thriven calves in meads their food forsake,And render their sweet souls before the plenteous rack. Dryden's Virgil.
A little hope — but I have none.On air the poor camelions thrive,Deny'd ev'n that my love can live. Granville.
Such a care hath always been taken of the city charities, that they have thriven and prospered gradually from their infancy, down to this very day. Atterbury's Sermons.
In the fat age of pleasure, wealth and ease,Sprung the rank weed, and thriv'd with large increase. Pope's Essay on Criticism.
Diligence and humility is the way to thrive in the riches of the understanding, as well as in gold. Watt's Logick.

Tid
Tid. adj. [ꞇẏꝺꝺꞃ, Saxon.] Tender; soft; nice.

Tiger
Ti'ger. n.s. [tigre, Fr. tigris, Latin.] A fierce beast of the leonine kind.
 When the blast of war blows in your ear, Then imitate the action of the tiger: Stiffen the sinews, summon up the blood. Shakesp. H. V.
 Approach thou like the rugged Russian bear, The arm'd rhinoceros, or Hyrcanian tiger; Take any shape but that, and my firm nerves Shall never tremble. Shakesp. Macbeth.
 This tiger-footed rage, when it shall find The harm of unskain'd swiftness will, too late, Tie leaden pounds to's heels. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
 Tigris, in the medals of Trajan, is drawn like an old man, and by his side a tiger. Peacham on Drawing.
                 Has the steer, At whose strong chest the deadly tiger hangs, E'er plow'd for him. Thomson's Spring.

Tillyfally


Tillyvalley


Tilman
Ti'lman. n.s. [till and man.] One who tills; an husbandman.
 Good shepherd, good tilman, good Jack and good Gil, Makes husband and huswife their coffers to fil. Tusser.

Tilt (noun)


Tilt (verb active)


Tilt (verb neuter)


Tilter


Tilth (adjective)


Tilth (noun)


Timber (noun)


Timber (verb active)
To Ti'mber. v.a. To furnish with beams or timber.

Timber (verb neuter)
To Ti'mber. v.n. [from the noun.] To light on a tree. A cant word.
The one took up in a thicket of brush-wood, and the other timbered upon a tree hard by. L'Estrange's Fables.

Timbered
Ti'mbered. adj. [from timber; timbrè, Fr.] Built; formed ; contrived.
He left the succession to his second son; not because he thought him the best timbered to support it. Wotton.
Many heads that undertake learning were never squared nor timbered for it. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. i.

Timbersow


Timbrel
Ti'mbrel. n.s. [timbre, Fr. tympanum, Latin.] A kind of musical instrument played by pulsation.
            The damsels they delight, When they their timbrels smite, And thereunto dance and carrol sweet. Spenser's Epithal.
In their hands sweet timbrels all upheld on hight. Fa. Q.
Praise with timbrels, organs, flutes; Praise with violins and lutes. Sandys's Paraph.
For her through Egypt's fruitful clime renown'd, Let weeping Nilus hear the timbrel sound. Pope's Statius.

Time (noun)
Time. n.s. [ꞇıma, Saxon; tym, Erse.]

The measure of duration.
 This consideration of duration, as set out by certain periods, and marked by certain measures or epochas, is that which most properly we call time. Locke.
 Time is like a fashionable host, That slightly shakes his parting guest by th' hand, But with his arms out-stretch'd, as he would fly, Grasps the incomer. Shakesp. Troilus and Cressida.
               Come what come may, Time and the hour runs through the roughest day. Shakesp.
Nor will polished amber, although it send forth a gross exhalement, be found a long time defective upon the exactest scale. Brown's Vulgar Errours b. ii.
 Time, which consisteth of parts, can be no part of infinite duration, or of eternity; for then there would be infinite time past to day, which to morrow will be more than infinite. Time is therefore one thing, and infinite duration is another. Grew's Cosmol. b. i.
Space of time.
 Daniel desired that he would give him time, and that he would shew him the interpretation. Dan. ii. 16.
 He for the time remain'd stupidly good. Milton.
 No time is allowed for digressions. Swift.
Interval.
 Pomanders, and knots of powders, you may have continually in your hand; whereas perfumes you can take but at times. Bacon's Nat. Hist. №. 929.
Season; proper time.
 To every thing there is a season, and a time to every purpose. Eccles. iii. 1.
 They were cut down out of time, whose foundation was overflown with a flood. Job xxii. 16.
 He found nothing but leaves on it; for the time of figs was not yet. Mar. xi. 13.
 Knowing the time, that it is high time to awake out of sleep. Rom. xiii. 11.
 Short were her marriage joys; for in the prime Of youth her lord expir'd before his time. Dryden.
 I hope I come in time, if not to make, At least, to save your fortune and your honour: Take heed you steer your vessel right. Dryden.
 The time will come when we shall be forced to bring our evil ways to remembrance, and then consideration will do us little good. Calamy's Sermons.
A considerable space of duration; continuance; process of time.
 Fight under him, there's plunder to be had; A captain is a very gainful trade: And when in service your best days are spent, In time you may command a regiment. Dryden's Journal.
 In time the mind reflects on its own operations about the ideas got by sensation, and thereby stores itself with a new set of ideas, ideas of reflection. Locke.
 One imagines, that the terrestrial matter which is showered down along with rain enlarges the bulk of the earth, and that it will in time bury all things under-ground. Woodward.
 I have resolved to take time, and, in spite of all misfortunes, to write you, at intervals, a long letter. Swift.
Age; particular part of time.
 When that company died, what time the fire devoured two hundred and fifty men. Num. xxvi. 10.
 They shall be given into his hand until a time and times. Dan. vii. 25.
 If we should impute the heat of the season unto the co-operation of any stars with the sun, it seems more favourable for our times to ascribe the same unto the constellation of leo. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv.
 The way to please being to imitate nature, the poets and the painters, in ancient times, and in the best ages, have studied her. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
Past time.
 I was the man in th' moon when time was. Shakespeare.
Early time.
 Stanley at Bosworth field, though he came time enough to save his life, yet he staid long enough to endanger it. Bacon.
 If they acknowledge repentance and a more strict obedience to be one time or other necessary, they imagine it is time enough yet to set about these duties. Rogers.
Time considered as affording opportunity.
 The earl lost no time, but marched day and night. Clarend.
 He continued his delights till all the enemies horse were passed through his quarters; nor did then pursue them in any time. Clarendon, b. viii.
 Time is lost, which never will renew, While we too far the pleasing path pursue, Surveying nature. Dryden's Virgil.
Particular quality of the present.
 Comets, importing change of times and states, Brandish your crystal tresses in the sky. Shakespeare.
 All the prophets in their age, the times Of great Messiah sing. Milton's Par. Lost, b. xii.
 If any reply, that the times and manners of men will not bear such a practice, that is an answer from the mouth of a professed time-server. South's Sermons.
Particular time.
 Give order, that no sort of person Have, any time, recourse unto the princes. Shakespeare.
 The worst on me must light, when time shall be. Milt.
 A time will come, when my maturer muse In Cæsar's wars a nobler theme shall chuse. Dryden.
 These reservoirs of snow they cut, distributing them to several shops, that from time to time supply Naples. Addison.
Hour of childbirth.
 She intended to stay till delivered; for she was within one month of her time. Clarendon.
 The first time I saw a lady dressed in one of these petticoats, I blamed her for walking abroad when she was so near her time; but soon I found all the modish part of the sex as far gone as herself. Addison's Spect. №. 127.
Repetition of any thing, or mention with reference to repetition.
Four times he cross'd the car of night. Milton.
 Every single particle would have a sphere of void space around it many hundred thousand million million times bigger than the dimensions of that particle. Bentley.
 Lord Oxford I have now the third time mentioned in this letter expects you. Swift.
Musical measure.
              Musick do I hear! Ha, ha!  keep time. How sour sweet musick is When time is broke, and no proportion kept. Shakespeare.
 You by the help of tune and time Can make that song which was but rime. Waller.
          On their exalted wings To the celestial orbs they climb, And with th' harmonious spheres keep time. Denham.
 Heroes who o'ercome, or die, Have their hearts hung extremely high; The strings of which in battle's heat Against their very corslets beat; Keep time with their own trumpet's measure, And yield them most excessive pleasure. Prior.

Time (verb)


Timeful


Timeless
Ti'meless. adj. [from time.]

 Unseasonable; done at an improper time.
 Nor fits it to prolong the heav'nly feast Timeless, indecent, but to retire to rest. Pope's Odyssey.
 Untimely; immature; done before the proper time.
 A pack of sorrows, which would press you down, If unprevented, to your timeless grave. Shakesp.
                      Noble Gloster's death, Who wrought it with the king, and who perform'd The bloody office of his timeless end. Shakesp. Rich. II,

Tincture (noun)
Ti'ncture.  n.s. [teinture, Fr. tinctura from tinctus, Lat.]

 Colour or taste superadded by something.
The sight must be sweetly deceived by an insensible passage from bright colours to dimmer, which Italian artizans call the middle tinctures. Wotton's Architecture.
Hence the morning planet gilds her horn,By tincture or reflection they augmentTheir small peculiar. Milton.
'Tis the fate of princes that no knowledgeCome pure to them, but passing through the eyesAnd ears of other men, it takes a tinctureFrom every channel. Denham.
That beloved thing engrosses him, and, like a coloured glass before his eyes, casts its own colour and tincture upon all the images of things. South.
To begin the practice of an art with a light tincture of the rules, is to expose ourselves to the scorn of those who are judges. Dryden.
Malignant tempers, whatever kind of life they are engaged in, will discover their natural tincture of mind. Addis.
Few in the next generation who will not write and read, and have an early tincture of religion. Addison.


Sire of her joy and source of her delight;O! wing'd with pleasure take thy happy flight,And give each future morn a tincture of thy white.

  Prior.


All manners take a tincture from our own,Or some discolour'd through our passions shown. Pope.
have a care lest some darling science so far prevail over your mind, as to give a sovereign tincture to all your other studies, and discolour all your ideas. Watts.
 Extract of some drug made in spirits; an infusion.
In tinctures drawn from vegetables, the superfluous spirit of wine distilled off leaves the extract of the vegetable. Boyle.

Tincture (verb)
To Ti'ncture. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To imbue or impregnate with some colour or taste.
The bright sun compacts the precious stone,Imparting radiant lustre like his own:He tinctures rubies with their rosy hue,And on the saphire spreads a heavenly blue. Blackmore.
A little black paint will tincture and spoil twenty gay colours. Watts.
 To imbue the mind.
Early were our minds tinctured with a distinguishing sense of good and evil; early were the seeds of a divine love, and holy fear of offending, sown in our hearts. Atterbury.

Tire (noun)
Tire. n.s. [tuyr, Dutch.]

 Rank; row.
Your lowest tire of ordnance must lie four feet clear above water, when all loading is in, or else those your best pieces will be of small use at sea, in any grown weather that makes the billows to rise. Raleigh's Essays.
Stood rank'd of seraphim another row,In posture to displode their second tireOf thunder. Milton's Par. Lost, b. vi.
In all those wars there were few triremes, most of them being of one tire of oars of fifty banks. Arbuthnot.
 [Corrupted from tiar or tiara, or attire.] A head-dress.
On her head she wore a tire of gold,Adorn'd with gems and ouches. Fairy Queen.
Here is her picture: let me see;If I had such a tire, this face of mineWere full as lovely as is this of hers. Shakespeare.
The judge of torments, and the king of tears,Now fills a burnish'd throne of quenchless fire,And for his old fair robes of light he wearsA gloomy mantle of dark flame, the tireThat crowns his hated head on high, appears. Crashaw.
When the fury took her stand on high,A hiss from all the snaky tire went round. Pope.
 Furniture; apparatus.
                Saint George's worthEnkindles like desire of high exploits:Immediate sieges, and the tire of warRowl in thy eager mind. Philips.
When they first peep forth of the ground, they shew their whole tire of leaves, then flowers, next seeds. Woodward.

Titbit
Titbi't. n.s. [properly tidbit; tid, tender, and bit.] Nice bit; nice food.
John pampered esquire South with titbits till he grew wanton. Arbuthnot.

To-night


Tomb (noun)
Tomb. n.s. [tombe, tombeau, Fr. tumba, low Lat.] A monument in which the dead are enclosed.
 Methinks, I see thee, now thou art below, As one dead in the bottom of a tomb. Shakespeare.
 Time is drawn upon tombs an old man bald, winged, with a sithe and an hour-glass. Peacham on Drawing.
 Poor heart! she slumbers in her silent tomb, Let her possess in peace that narrow room. Dryden.
 The secret wound with which I bleed Shall lie wrapt up, ev'n in my herse, But on my tomb-stone thou shalt read My answer to thy dubious verse. Prior.

Tombless
Tómbless. adj. [from tomb.] Wanting a tomb; wanting a sepulchral monument.
 Lay these bones in an unworthy urn, Tombless, with no remembrance over them. Shakespeare.

Tomboy
Tómboy. n.s. [Tom, a diminutive of Thomas, and boy.] A mean fellow; sometimes a wild coarse girl.
                     A lady Fasten'd to an empery, to be partner'd With tomboys, hir'd with that self-exhibition Which your own coffers yield! Shakesp. Cymbeline.

Tome
Tome. n.s. [Fr. τομὸς.]

 One volume of many.

 A book.
 All those venerable books of scripture, all those sacred tomes and volumes of holy writ, are with such absolute perfection framed. Hooker.

Tooth (noun)
Tooth. n.s. plural teeth. [toð, Saxon; tand, Dutch.]

The teeth are the hardest and smoothest bones of the body; they are formed in the cavities of the jaws, and about the seventh or eighth month after birth they begin to pierce the edge of the jaw, tear the periosteum and gums, which being very sensible create a violent pain: the dentes incisivi, or fore teeth of the upper jaw, appear first, and then those of the lower jaw, because they are the thinnest and the sharpest; after them come out the canini or eye teeth, and last of all the molores or grinders, because they are the thickest and bluntest: about the seventh year of age they are thrust out by new teeth which then begin to sprout, and if these teeth be lost they never grow again; but some have been observed to shed their teeth twice: about the one-and-twentieth year the two last of the molares spring up, and they are called dentes sapientiæ. Quincy.
                Avaunt, you curs!Be thy mouth or black or white,Tooth that poisons if it bite. Shakesp. King Lear.
Desert deserves with characters of brassA forted residence against the tooth of time,And razure of oblivion. Shakespeare.
The teeth alone among the bones continue to grow in length during a man's whole life, as appears by the unsightly length of one tooth when its opposite happens to be pulled out. Ray on the Creation.
 Taste; palate.
These are not dishes for thy dainty tooth;What, hast thou got an ulcer in thy mouth?Why stand'st thou picking? Dryden.
 A tine, prong, or blade, of any multifid instrument.
The priests servant came while the flesh was in seething, with a flesh hook of three teeth. 1 Sam. ii. 13.
I made an instrument in fashion of a comb, whose teeth, being in number sixteen, were about an inch and a half broad, and the intervals of the teeth about two inches wide. Newton's Opticks.
 The prominent part of wheels, by which they catch upon correspondent parts of other bodies.
The edge whereon the teeth are is always made thicker than the back, because the back follows the edge. Moxon.
In clocks, though the screws and teeth be never so smooth, yet if they be not oiled will hardly move, though you clog them with never so much weight; but apply a little oil they whirl about very swiftly with the tenth part of the force. Ray.
 Tooth and nail. With one's utmost violence; with every means of attack or defence.
A lion and bear were at tooth and nail which should carry off a fawn. L'Estrange's Fables.
 To the Teeth. In open opposition.
It warms the very sickness in my heart,That I shall live and tell him to his teeth,Thus diddest thou. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
                        The action liesIn his true nature, and we ourselves compell'd,Ev'n to the teeth and forehead of our faults,To give in evidence. Shakespeare.
The way to our horses lies back again by the house, and then we shall meet 'em full in the teeth. Dryden.
 To cast in the Teeth. To insult by open exprobration.
A wise body's part it were not to put out his fire, because his fond and foolish neighbour, from whom he borrowed wherewith to kindle it, might cast him therewith in the teeth, saying, were it not for me thou wouldst freeze, and not be able to heat thyself. Hooker, b. iv.
 In spite of the teeth. Notwithstanding threats expressed by shewing teeth; notwithstanding any power of injury or defence.
The guiltiness of my mind drove the grossness of the foppery into a received belief, in despight of the teeth of all rhime and reason, that they were fairies. Shakespeare.
The only way is not to grumble at the lot they must bear in spite of their teeth. L'Estrange.

Tornado
Tornádo. n.s. [tornado, Spanish.] A hurricane; a whirlwind.
Nimble coruscations strike the eye,And bold tornado's bluster in the sky. Garth.

Torpedo
Torpédo. n.s. [Lat.] A fish which while alive, if touched even with a long stick, benumbs the hand that so touches it, but when dead is eaten safely.

Torpent
Tórpent. adj. [torpeus, Latin.] Benumbed; struck motionless; not active; incapable of motion.
A comprehensive expedient to assist the frail and torpent memory through so multifarious an employment. Evelyn.

Torrent (noun)
Tórrent. n.s. [torrent, Fr. torrens, Lat.]

 A sudden stream raised by summer showers.
                The near in blood,Forsake me like the torrent of a flood. Sandys on Job.
Will no kind flood, no friendly rain,Disguise the marshal's plain disgrace;No torrents swell the low Mohayne,The world will say he durst not pass. Prior.
 A violent and rapid stream; tumultuous current.
Not far from Caucasus are certain steep falling torrents, which wash down many grains of gold, as in many other parts of the world; and the people there inhabiting use to set many fleeces of wool in these descents of waters, in which the grains of gold remain, and the water passeth through, which Strabo witnesseth to be true. Raleigh.
The memory of those who, out of duty and conscience, opposed that torrent which did overwhelm them, should not lose the recompence due to their virtue. Clarendon.
When shrivell'd herbs on with'ring stems decay,The wary ploughman, on the mountain's brow,Undams his wat'ry stores, huge torrents flow,Temp'ring the thirsty fever of the field. Dryden's Georg.
Erasmus, that great injur'd name,Stemm'd the wild torrent of a barb'rous age. Pope.

Towel
Tówel. n.s. [touaille, French; touaglio, Italian.] A cloath on which the hands are wiped.
 His arm must be kept up with a napkin or towel. Wiseman.
 Th' attendants water for their hands supply, And having wash'd, with silken towels dry. Dryden's Æn.

Treat (noun)
Treat. n.s. [from the verb.]

 An entertainment given.
 This is the ceremony of my fate; A parting treat, and I'm to die in state. Dryden.
 He pretends a great concern for his country, and insight into matters: now such professions, when recommended by a treat, dispose an audience to hear reason. Collier.
 What tender maid but must a victim fall For one man's treat, but for another's ball? Pope.
 Something given at an entertainment.
 Dry figs and grapes, and wrinkled dates were set, In canisters t' enlarge the little treat. Dryden.
 The King of gods revolving in his mind Lycaon's guilt and his inhuman treat. Dryden.

Treat (verb neuter)
To Treat. v.n. [traiter, Fr. trahtian, Saxon.]

 To discourse; to make discussions.
 Of love they treat till th' ev'ning star appear'd. Milton.
 Absence, what the poets call death in love, has given occasion to beautiful complaints in those authors who have treated of this passion in verse. Addison's Spect.
 To practise negotiation.
 The king treated with them. 2 Mac. xiii. 22.
 To come to terms of accommodation.
 Inform us, will the emp'ror treat? Swift.
 To make gratuitous entertainments.

Tree
Tree. n.s. [trie, Islandick; tree, Danish.]

 A large vegetable rising, with one woody stem, to a considerable height.
Trees and shrubs, of our native growth in England, are distinguished by Ray. 1. Such as have their flowers disjointed and remote from the fruit; and these are, 1. Nuciferous ones; as, the walnut tree, the hazel-nut tree, the beach, the chesnut, and the common oak. 2. Coniferous ones; of this kind are the Scotch firs, male and female; the pine, the common alder tree, and the birch tree. 3. Bacciferous; as, the juniper and yew trees. 4. Lanigerous ones; as, the black, white, and trembling poplar, willows, and osiers of all kinds. 5. Such as bear their seeds, having an imperfect flower, in leafy membranes; as, the horse-bean. 6. Such as have their fruits and flowers contiguous; of these some are pomiferous; as, apples and pears: and some bacciferous; as, the sorb or service tree, the white or hawthorn, the wild rose, sweet brier, currants, the great bilbery bush, honeysuckle, joy. Pruniferous ones, whose fruit is pretty large and soft, with a stone in the middle; as, the black-thorn or sloe tree, the black and white bullace tree, the black cherry, &c. Bacciferous ones; as, the strawberry tree in the west of Ireland, mistletoe, water elder, the dwarf, a large laurel, the viburnum or way-fairing tree, the dog-berry tree, the sea black thorn, the berry-bearing elder, the privet barberry, common elder, the holy, the buckthorn, the berry-bearing heath, the bramble, and spindle tree or prickwood.  Such as have their fruit dry when ripe; as, the bladder nut tree, the box tree, the common elm and ash, the maple, the gaule or sweet willow, common heath, broom, dryers wood, furze or gorse, the lime tree, &c. Miller.
Sometimes we see a cloud that's dragonish,A forked mountain, or blue promontoryWith trees upon't, that nod unto the world,And mock our eyes with air. Shakesp. Ant. and Cleopatra.
Who can bid the tree unfix his earth-bound root. Shak.
It is pleasant to look upon a tree in Summer covered with green leaves, decked with blossoms, or laden with fruit, and casting a pleasant shade: but to consider how this tree sprang from a little seed, how nature shaped and fed it till it came to this greatness, is a more rational pleasure. Burnet.
Trees shoot up in one great stem, and at a good distance from the earth, spread into branches: thus gooseberries are shrubs, and oaks are trees. Locke.
 Any thing branched out.
Vain are their hopes who fancy to inherit,By trees of pedigrees, or fame or merit:Though plodding heralds through each branch may traceOld captains and dictators of their race. Dryden.

Trephine
Trephíne. n.s. A small trepan; a smaller instrument of perforation managed by one hand.
I shewed a trepan and trephine, and gave them liberty to try both upon a skull. Wiseman's Surgery.

Tribe
Tribe. n.s. [tribu, Fr. tribus, Lat. from trev, b and v being labials of promiscuous use in the ancient British words; trev from tir ef, his lands, is supposed to be Celtick, and used before the Romans had any thing to do with the British government; to prove which Mr. Rowland offers many reasons, which he mentions by imagining that centuriæ is derived from trev, supposing it to be the same with our centrev, importing a hundred trevs or tribes.]

 A distinct body of the people as divided by family or fortune, or any other characteristick.
 I ha' been writing all this night unto all the tribes And centuries for their voices, to help Catiline In his election. Benj. Johnson's Cataline.
 If the heads of the tribes can be taken off, and the misled multitude will see their error, such extent of mercy is honourable. Bacon's Advice to Villiers.
 Who now shall rear you to the sun, or rank Your tribes, and water from th' ambrosial fount. Milton.
 Straggling mountaineers, for publick good, To rank in tribes, and quit the savage wood, Houses to build. Tate.
 I congratulate my country upon the increase of this happy tribe of men, since, by the present parliament, the race of freeholders is spreading into the remotest corners. Addison.
 It is often used in contempt.
 Folly and vice are easy to describe, The common subjects of our scribbling tribe. Roscommon.

Trick (noun)
Trick. n.s. [treck, Dutch.]

 A sly fraud.
 Sir Thomas Moor said, that a trick of law had no less power than the wheel of fortune, to lift men up, or cast them down. Raleigh.
 A bantering droll took a journey to Delphos, to try if he could put a trick upon Apollo. L'Estrange's Fables.
 Such a one thinks to find some shelter in my friendship, and I betray him: he comes to me for counsel and I shew him a trick. South.
 He swore by Stix, Whate'er she wou'd desire, to grant; But wise Ardelia knew his tricks. Swift.
 A dexterous artifice.
 Gather the lowest and leaving the top, Shall teach thee a trick for to double thy crop. Tusser.
 And now, as oft in some distemper'd state, On one nice trick depends the gen'ral fate. Pope.
 A vicious practice.
 Suspicion shall be stuck full of eyes: For treason is but trusted like a fox, Who ne'er so tame, so cherish'd and lock'd up, Will have a wild trick of his ancestors. Shakespeare.
 I entertain you with somewhat more worthy than the stale exploded trick of fulsom panegyricks. Dryden.
 Some friends to vice pretend, That I the tricks of youth too roughly blame. Dryden.
 A juggle; an antick; any thing done to cheat jocosely, or to divert.
 A rev'rend prelate stopp'd his coach and six, To laugh a little at our Andrew's tricks. Prior.
 An unexpected effect.
 So fellest foes who broke their sleep, To take the one the other, by some chance, Some trick not worth an egg, shall grow dear friends. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
 A practice; a manner; a habit.
 I spoke it but according to the trick: if you'll hang me you may. Shakespeare.
 The trick of that voice I well remember. Shakespeare.
                             Behold, Although the print be little, the whole matter And copy of the father; eye, nose, lip, The trick of 's frown, his forehead. Shak. Winter's Tale.
 A number of cards laid regularly up in play: as, a trick of cards.

Turgid
Túrgid. adj. [turgidus, Lat.]

 Swelling; bloated; filling more room than before.
A bladder, moderately fill'd with air, and strongly tied, held near the fire grew turgid and hard; and brought nearer, suddenly broke with a vehement noise. Boyle.
The spirits embroil'd with the malignity, and drowned in the blood turgid and tumified by the febril fermentation, are by phlebotomy relieved. Harvey on Consumptions.
                Disburthen thou thy sapless woodOf its rich progeny; the turgid fruitAbounds with mellow liquor. Philips.
Those channels turgid with th' obstructed tideStretch their small holes and make their meshes wide. Bla.
 Pompous; tumid; fastuous; vainly magnificent.
Some have a violent and turgid manner of talking and thinking; whatsoever they judge of is with a tincture of this vanity. Watt's Logick.

Turkey
Túrkey. n.s. [gallina turcica, Lat.] A large domestick fowl brought from Turkey.
Here he comes swelling like a turkey-cock. Shakesp.
The turkey-cock hath swelling gills, the hen less. Bacon.
So speeds the wily fox,Who lately filch'd the turkey's callow care. Gay.

Turnip
Túrnip. n.s. A white esculent root.
The flower consists of four leaves, which are placed in form of a cross; out of the flower cup rises the pointal, which afterward turns to a pod, divided into two cells by an intermediate partition, to which the valves adhere on both sides, and are full of roundish seeds: a carneous and tuberose root. Miller.
 November is drawn with bunches of parsnips and turnips in his right-hand. Peacham on Drawing.
 The goddess rose amid the inmost round, With wither'd turnip-tops her temples crown'd. Gay.
 Turnips hide their swelling heads below. Gay's Past.

Turtle
Túrtle.Túrtledove.

n.s. [turtle, Saxon; tortorelle, French; tortarella, Italian; turtur, Latin.]



 A species of dove.
When shepherds pipe on oaten straws,And merry larks are ploughmens clocks:When turtles tread. Shak. Love's Lab. Lost.
We'll teach him to know turtles from jays. Shak.
Take me an heifer and a turtle dove. Gen. xv. 9.
Galen propos'd the blood of turtles dropt warm from their wings. Wiseman.
 It is used among sailors and gluttons for a tortoise.

Turtledove
Túrtle.Túrtledove.

n.s. [turtle, Saxon; tortorelle, French; tortarella, Italian; turtur, Latin.]



 A species of dove.
When shepherds pipe on oaten straws,And merry larks are ploughmens clocks:When turtles tread. Shak. Love's Lab. Lost.
We'll teach him to know turtles from jays. Shak.
Take me an heifer and a turtle dove. Gen. xv. 9.
Galen propos'd the blood of turtles dropt warm from their wings. Wiseman.
 It is used among sailors and gluttons for a tortoise.

Tush
Tush. interj. [Of this word I can find no credible etymology.] An expression of contempt.
Tush, say they, how should God perceive it: is there knowledge in the most high? Psalm lxxiii.
Sir Thomas Moor found fault with his lady's continual chiding, saying; the consideration of the time, for it was sent, should restrain her. Tush, tush, my lord, said she, look, here is one step to heaven-ward, shewing him a friar's girdle.  I fear me, quoth Sir Thomas, this one step will not bring you up a step higher. Camden's Remains.
Tush never tell me, I take it much unkindlyThat thou, Iago, who hast had my purse,As if the strings were thine, should know of this. Shak.

Tusk
Tusk. n.s. [tẏxaf, Saxon; tosken, old Frisick.] The long teeth of a pugnacious animal; the fang; the holding tooth.
Some creatures have over-long, or out-growing teeth, called fangs, or tusks; as boars and pikes. Bacon.
The boar depended upon his tusks. L'Estrange.
As two boars,With rising bristles, and with frothy jaws,Their adverse breasts with tusks oblique they wound. Dryd.
A monstrous boarWhetting his tusks, and churning hideous foam. Smith.

Tusked
Túsked.Túsky.

adj. [from tusk.] furnished with tusks.


Into the naked woods he goes,And seeks the tusky boar to tear. Dryden.
Of those beasts no one was horned and tusked too: the superfluous blood not sufficing to feed both. Grew.

Tusky
Túsked.Túsky.

adj. [from tusk.] furnished with tusks.


Into the naked woods he goes,And seeks the tusky boar to tear. Dryden.
Of those beasts no one was horned and tusked too: the superfluous blood not sufficing to feed both. Grew.

Tussuck
Tússuck. n.s. [diminitive of tuzz.] A tuft of grass or twigs.
The first is remarkable for the several tussucks or bunches of thorns, wherewith it is armed round. Grew.

Tut
Tut. interj. [This seems to be the same with tush.] A particle noting contempt.
Tut, tut! grace me no grace, nor uncle me no uncle. Shak.
Tut, tut! here's a mannerly forbearance. Shakesp.

Tutanag
Tutanag. n.s.
Tutanage is the Chinese name for spelter, which we erroneously apply to the metal of which canisters are made, that are brought over with the tea from China.  It being a coarse pewter made with the lead carried from England and tin got in the kingdom of Quintang. Woodward.

Tutelage
Tútelage. n.s. [tutelle, tutelage, Fr. tutela, Lat.] Guardianship; state of being under guardian.
If one in the possession of lands die, and leave a minor to succeed to him, his tutelage belongeth to the king. Drummond.
He accoupled the ambassage with an article in the nature of a request, that the French king might, according unto his right of seigniory or tutelage; dispose of the marriage of the young duchess of Britany. Bacon.

Tutelar


Tutelary


Tutor (noun)
Tutor. n.s. [tutor, Lat. tuteur, Fr.] One who has the care of another's learning and morals; a teacher or instructor.
 When I am as I have been, Approach me, and thou shalt be as thou wast, The tutor and the seeder of my riots; Till then I banish thee on pain of death. Shakesp.
 Ah, tutor, look where bloody Clifford comes. Shakesp.
 When nobles are the tailors tutors; No hereticks burnt but wenches suiters. Butler.
 A primitive Christian, that coming to a friend to teach him a psalm, began, I said I will look to my ways, that I offend not with my tongue; upon which he stop'd his tutor, saying, this is enough if I learn it. Government of the Tongue.
 His body thus adorn'd, he next design'd With lib'ral arts to cultivate his mind: He sought a tutor of his own accord, And study'd lessons he before abhorr'd. Dryden.
 No science is so speedily learned by the noblest genius without a tutor. Watts.

Tutor (verb)
To Tu'tor. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To instruct, to teach; to document.
 This boy is forest born, And hath been tutor'd in the rudiments Of many desperate studies by his uncle. Shakesp.
                      He cannot be a perfect man, Not being tried and tutor'd in the world. Shakesp.
 The cock has his spurs, and he strikes his feet inward with singular strength and order; yet he does not this by any syllogistical method, but is merely tutored by instinct. Hale.
 To treat with superiority or severity.
                 I hardly yet have learn'd T' insinuate, flatter, bow, and bend my knee: Give sorrow leave a while to tutor me To this submission. Shakesp. Rich. II.
  I take a review of my little boys mounted upon hobby-horses, and of little girls tutoring their babies. Addison.

Tutorage
Tu'torage. n.s. [from tutor.]  The authority or solemnity of a tutor.
Children care not for the the company of their parents or tutors, and men will care less for theirs, who would make them children by usurping a tutorage. Govern. of the Tongue.

Tutoress
Tu'toress. n.s. [from tutor.] Directress; instructress; governess.
Fidelia shall be your tutoress. Moore's Foundling.

Tutsan
Tútsan, or parkleaves. n.s. [androsæmum, Lat.] A plant.

Tutty
Tutty. n.s. [tutia, low Lat. tuthic, Fr.] A sublimate of zinc or calamine collected in the furnace. Ainsw.

Tuz
Tuz. n.s. [I know not whether it is not a word merely of cant.] A lock or tuft of hair.
With odorous oil thy head and hair are sleek;And then thou kemp'st the tuzzes on thy cheek;Of these thy barbers take a costly care. Dryden.

Twain
Twain. adj. [twʒen, batwa, both twain, Saxon.] Two. An old word, not now used but ludicrously.
 'Tis not the tyral of a woman's war, The bitter clamour of two eager tongues, Can arbitrate this cause betwixt us twain. Shakesp.
             Such smiling rogues as these, Like rats, oft bite the holy cords in twain, Too intricate t' unloose. Shakesp. King Lear.
 Of my condition take no care; It fits not; thou and I long since are twain. Milton.
 When old winter split the rocks in twain; He strip'd the bears-foot of its leafy growth. Dryden.
 The trembling widow, and her daughters twain, This woeful cackling cry with horror heard. Dryden.

Twang (interjection)
Twang. interj. A word making a quick action, accompanied with a sharp sound. Little used, and little deserving to be used.
 There's one, the best in all my quiver, Twang! thro' his very heart and liver. Prior.

Twang (noun)
Twang. n.s. [from the verb.]

 A sharp quick sound.
 They by the sound and twang of nose, If all be sound within, disclose. Butler's Hudibras.
 So swells each wind-pipe; ass intones to ass, Harmonic twang of leather, horn and brass. Pope.
 An affected modulation of the voice.
 If he be but a person in vogue with the multitude, he can make popular, rambling, in coherent stuff, seasoned with twang and tautology, pass for high rhetorick. South's Sermons.
 He has such a twang in his discourse, and ungraceful way of speaking thro' his nose, that one can hardly understand him. Arbuthnot.

Twang (verb active)
To Twang. v.a. To make to sound sharply.
 A swaggering accent sharply twang'd off, gives manhood approbation. Shak. Twelfth Night.

Twang (verb neuter)
To Twang. v.n. [A word formed from the sound.] To sound with a quick sharp noise.
                 A thousand twanging instruments Will hum about mine ears. Shakesp. Tempest.
 His quiver o'er his shoulders Phœbus threw, His bow twang'd, and his arrows rattled as they flew. Dryd.
 With her thund'ring voice she menac'd high; And every accent twang'd with smarting sorrow. Dryden.
         The twanging bows Send showers of shafts, that on their barbed points Alternate ruin bear. Philips.
 Sounds the tough horn and twangs the quiv'ring string. Pope.

Tweezers
Tweézers. n.s. [etuy, French.] Nippers, or small pincers, to pluck off hairs.
 There hero's wits are kept in pond'rous vases, And beaus in snuff-boxes and tweezer cases. Pope.

Tympany
Týmpany. n.s. [from tympanum, Lat.] A kind of obstructed flatulence that swells the body like a drum.
Hope, the christian grace, must be proportioned and attemperate to the promise; if it exceed that temper and proportion,  it becomes a tumour and tympany of hope. Hamm.
He does not shew us Rome great suddenly,As if the empire were a tympany,But gives it natural growth, tells how and whyThe little body grew so large and high. Suckling.
            Others that affectA lofty stile, swell to a tympany. Roscommon.
Pride is no more than an unnatural tympany, that rises in a bubble, and spends itself in a blast? L'Estrange.
Nor let thy mountain-belly make pretenceOf likeness; thine's a tympany of sense.A tun of man in thy large bulk is writ,But sure thou'rt but a kikilderkin of wit. Dryden.
The air is so rarified in this kind of dropsical tumour as makes it hard and tight like a drum, and from thence it is called a tympany. Arbuthnot.

Tyny
Tyny. adj. Small.
He that has a little tyny wit,Must make content with his fortunes fit. Shakespeare.

Type
Type. n.s. [type, Fr. typus, Lat. τύπος.]

 Emblem; mark of something.
            Clean renouncingThe faith they have in tennis, and tall stockings,Short bolster'd breeches, and those types of travel,And understanding again the honest men. Shakespeare.
Thy emblem, gracious queen, the British rose,Type of sweet rule, and gentle majesty. Prior.
 That by which something future is prefigured.
          Informing them by typesAnd shadows of that destin'd seed to bruiseThe serpent, by what means he shall atchieveMankind's deliverance. Milton.
The Apostle shews the Christian religion to be in truth and substance what the Jewish was only in type and shadow. Tillotson's Sermons.
 A stamp; a mark not in use.
Thy father bears the type of King of Naples,Yet not so wealthy as an English yeoman. Shakespeare.
What good is cover'd with the face of heav'nTo be discovered, that can do me good?— Th' advancement of your children, gentle lady,— Up to some scaffold, there to lose their heads;— No, to the dignity and height of fortune,The high imperial type of this earth's glory. Shakespeare.
 A printing letter.

Typical
Týpick.Týpical.

n.s. [typique, Fr. typicus, Lat.] Emblematical; figurative of something else.


The Levitical priesthood was only typical of the christian; which is so much more holy and honourable than that, as the institution of Christ is more excellent than that of Moses. Atterbury.


Hence that many courses ran,Hand-in-hand, a goodly train,To bless the great Eliza's reign;



And in the typic glory showWhat fuller bliss Maria shall bestow. Prior.

Typically
Týpically. adv. [from typical.] In a typical manner.
This excellent communicativeness of the divine nature is typically represented, and mysteriously exemplified by the Porphyrian scale of being. Norris.

Typicalness
Týpicalness. n.s. [from typical.] The state of being typical.

Typick
Týpick.Týpical.

n.s. [typique, Fr. typicus, Lat.] Emblematical; figurative of something else.


The Levitical priesthood was only typical of the christian; which is so much more holy and honourable than that, as the institution of Christ is more excellent than that of Moses. Atterbury.


Hence that many courses ran,Hand-in-hand, a goodly train,To bless the great Eliza's reign;



And in the typic glory showWhat fuller bliss Maria shall bestow. Prior.

Typify
To Týpify. v.a. [from type.] To figure; to shew in emblem.
The resurrection of Christ hath the power of a pattern to us, and is so typified in baptism, as an engagement to rise to newness of life. Hammond.
Our Saviour was typified indeed by the goat that was slain; at the effusion of whose blood, not only the hard hearts of his enemies relented, but the stony rocks and vail of the temple were shattered. Brown's Vulg. Errours.

Typographer
Typógrapher. ad. [τύπος and γράφω.] A printer.

Typographical
Typográphical. adj. [from typography.]

 Emblematical; figurative.

 Belonging to the printer's art.

Typographically
Typográphically. adv. [from typographical.]

 Emblematically; figuratively.

 After the manner of printers.

Typography
Typógraphy. n.s. [typographic, Fr. typographia, Lat.]

 Emblematical, figurative, or hieroglyphical representation.
Those diminutive and pamphlet treatises daily published amongst us, are pieces containing rather typography than verity. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
 The art of printing.

Tyranness
Tyránness. n.s. [from tyrant.] A she tyrant.
They were by law of that proud tyranness,Provok'd with wrath and envy's false surmise. Fairy Qu.
        The tyranness doth joy to seeThe huge massacres which her eyes do make. Spenser.

Tyrannical
Tyránnical.Tyránnick.

n.s. [tyrannus, Latin; tyrannique, French; τυραννικὸς.] Suiting a tyrant; acting like a tyrant; cruel; despotick; imperious.


        Charge him home that affectsTyrannic power. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
You have contriv'd to takeFrom Rome all season'd office, and to windYourself into a power tyrannical. Shakespeare.
Domitian had been tyrannical; and in his time many noble houses were overthrown by false accusations. Bacon.
Our sects a more tyrannick power assume,And would for scorpions change the rods of Rome. Rosc.
Subdue and quell, o'er all the earth,Brute violence, and proud tyrannick pow'r. Milton.
If the spirit of a subject be rebellious, in a prince it will be tyrannical and intolerable. Taylor.
          She hath recourseTo tears and prayers, again she feels the smartOf a fresh wound from the tyrannick dart. Denham.
And by the nobles, by his commons curst,Th' oppressor rul'd tyrannick where he durst;Stretched o'er the poor and church his iron rod,And treats alike his vassals and his God. Pope.

Tyrannically
Tyránnically. adv. [from tyrannical.] In manner of a tyrant.

Tyrannicide
Tyránnicide. n.s. [tyrannus and cædo, Latin.] The act of killing a tyrant.

Tyrannick
Tyránnical.Tyránnick.

n.s. [tyrannus, Latin; tyrannique, French; τυραννικὸς.] Suiting a tyrant; acting like a tyrant; cruel; despotick; imperious.


        Charge him home that affectsTyrannic power. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
You have contriv'd to takeFrom Rome all season'd office, and to windYourself into a power tyrannical. Shakespeare.
Domitian had been tyrannical; and in his time many noble houses were overthrown by false accusations. Bacon.
Our sects a more tyrannick power assume,And would for scorpions change the rods of Rome. Rosc.
Subdue and quell, o'er all the earth,Brute violence, and proud tyrannick pow'r. Milton.
If the spirit of a subject be rebellious, in a prince it will be tyrannical and intolerable. Taylor.
          She hath recourseTo tears and prayers, again she feels the smartOf a fresh wound from the tyrannick dart. Denham.
And by the nobles, by his commons curst,Th' oppressor rul'd tyrannick where he durst;Stretched o'er the poor and church his iron rod,And treats alike his vassals and his God. Pope.

Tyrannise
To Týrannise. v.n. [tyraniser, Fr. from tyrant.] To play the tyrant; to act with rigour and imperiousness.
While we trust in the mercy of God thro' Christ Jesus, fear will not be able to tyrannise over us. Hooker.
Then gan Carausius tyrannise anew,And gainst the Romans bent their proper power,And so Alectus treacherously slew,And took on him the robe of Emperor. Fairy Queen.
          I made thee miserable,What time I threw the people's suffragesOn him, that thus doth tyrannise o'er me. Shakespeare.
A crew, whom like ambition joinsWith him, or under him to tyrannise. Milton.
Beauty had crown'd you, and you must have beenThe whole world's mistress, other than a queen;All had been rivals, and you might have spar'd,Or kill'd and tyrannis'd without a guard. Waller.
He does violence to his own faculties, tyrannises over his own mind, and usurps the prerogative that belongs to truth alone, which is to command assent by its own authority. Locke's Works.

Tyrannous
Týrranous. adj. [from tyrant.] Tyrannical; despotick; arbitrary; severe; cruel; imperious. Not in use.
It is strange to see the unmanlike cruelty of mankind, who, not content with their tyrannous ambition, to have brought the others virtuous patience under them, think their masterhood nothing without doing injury to them. Sidney.
Lately grown into a loathing and detestation of the unjust and tyrannous rule of Harold an usurper. Spenser.
Betwixt two charming words, comes in my father,And, like the tyrannous breathing of the north,Shakes all our buds from blowing. Shakespeare.
Subjection to his empire tyrannous. Milton.
            'Tis excellentTo have a giant's strength; but it is tyrannousTo use it like a giant. Shakespeare.
Fear you his tyrannous passion more, alas!Than the queen's life. Shakespeare.
After the death of this tyrannous and ambitious king, these writings came abroad. Temple.

Tyranny
Týranny. n.s. [tyrannis, Latin; τυραννὶς; tyrannie, Fr.]

 Absolute monarchy imperiously administered.
            Our grand foe,Who now triumphs, and, in th' excess of joy,Sole reigning holds the tyranny of heav'n. Milton.
The cities fell often under tyrannies, which spring naturally out of popular governments. Temple.
 Unresisted and cruel power.
            Boundless intemperanceIn nature is a tyranny; it hath beenTh' untimely emptying of the happy throne,And fall of many kings. Shakespeare.
 Cruel government; rigorous command.
                Bleed, bleed, poor country!Great tyranny lay thou thy basis sure,For goodness dares not check thee. Shakespeare.
Suspicions dispose kings to tyranny, and husbands to jealousy. Bacon.
          God in judgment just,Subjects him from without to violent lords;Who oft as undeservedly inthralHis outward freedom; tyranny must be. Milton.
 Severity; rigour; inclemency.
The tyranny o' the open night's too roughFor nature to endure. Shakespeare's King Lear.

Tyrant
Tyránt. n.s. [τύραννος; tyrannus, Latin. Rowland contends that this word, with the correspondent Greek and Latin, is derived from tir, Welch and Erse, land, and rhanner, Welch, to share, q. d. tirhanner, a sharer, or divider of and among his vassals.]

 An absolute monarch governing imperiously.

 A cruel despotick and severe master; an oppressor.
Love to a yielding heart is a king, but to a resisting is a tyrant. Sidney, b. i.
I would not be the villain that thou think'st,For the whole space that's in the tyrant's grasp,And the rich east to boot. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
Dissembling courtesy! how fine this tyrantCan tickle where she wounds! Shakesp. Cymb.
The house of woe, and dungeon of our tyrant. Milton.
Consider those grand agents and lieutenants of the devil, by whom he scourges and plagues the world under him, to wit, tyrants; and was there ever any tyrant who was not also false and persidious! South's Sermons
Thou meant'st to kill a tyrant, not a king. Dryden.
When tyrant custom had not shackl'd man,But free to follow nature was the mode. Thomson.

Tyre
Tyre. n.s. [Properly tire.] See Tire.
I have seen her beset and bedecked all over with emeralds and pearls, ranged in rows about the tyre of her head. Hakewill on Providence.

Tyro
Tyro. n.s. [Properly tiro, as in the Latin.] One yet not master of his art; one in his rudiments.
There stands a structure on a rising hill,Where tyro's take their freedom out to kill. Garth's Disp.
